CIK: 898437
Company Name: ANIKA THERAPEUTICS INC 
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2019-02-27
Accession Number: 0001171843-19-001243


ITEM 1 BUSINESS Overview We are a global, integrated orthopedic and regenerative medicines company committed to improving the lives of patients with degenerative orthopedic diseases and traumatic conditions with clinically meaningful therapies along the continuum of care, from palliative pain management to regenerative tissue repair. We have over 2 decades of global expertise developing, manufacturing, and commercializing more than twenty products based on its proprietary Hyaluronic Acid ( HA ) technology. Our orthopedic medicine portfolio includes ORTHOVISC, MONOVISC, and CINGAL, which alleviate pain and restore joint function by replenishing depleted HA, and HYALOFAST, a solid HA based scaffold to aid cartilage repair and regeneration. Our therapeutic offerings consist of products in the following areas Orthobiologics, Dermal, Surgical, and Other, which includes our ophthalmic and veterinary products. All of our products are based on HA, a naturally occurring, biocompatible polymer found throughout the body. Due to its unique biophysical and biochemical properties, HA plays an important role in a number of physiological functions such as the protection and lubrication of soft tissues and joints, the maintenance of the structural integrity of tissues, and the transport of molecules to and within cells. Our proprietary technologies for modifying the HA molecule allow product properties to be tailored specifically to therapeutic use. Our patented technology chemically modifies HA to allow for longer residence time in the body. We also offer products made from HA based on 2 other technologies HYAFF, which is a solid form of HA, and ACP gel, an autocross linked polymer of HA. Our technologies are protected by an extensive portfolio of owned and licensed patents. Since our inception in 1992, we have utilized a commercial partnership model for the distribution of our products to end users. Our strong, worldwide ne2rk of distributors has historically provided, and continues to provide, a solid foundation for our revenue growth and territorial expansion. For near term and long term opportunities in the U.S. market, we have evaluated a potential hybrid commercial approach that would see us balance a small direct model with an optimal form of strategic partnership, an approach we intend to utilize for the commercialization of our injectable, HA based surgical b1 repair product. For longer term future products in the U.S. market, we intend to evaluate our commercial model and possible alternatives or augmentations in each instance on a case by case basis, based on market dynamics and other factors. These models could include direct sales, distribution partnerships, or a hybrid of those forms. We believe that the combination of the direct and distribution commercial models will maximize the revenue potential from our current and future product portfolio. On May 2, 2018, we publicly disclosed a voluntary recall of certain production lots of our HYAFF based products, HYALOFAST, HYALOGRAFT C, and HYALOMATRIX. We communicated with all affected distributors in advance of that announcement, and we took all required or otherwise appropriate actions with respect to applicable regulatory bodies. We initiated the voluntary recall following internal quality testing, which indicated that the products were at risk of not maintaining certain measures throughout their entire shelf life. While there was no indication of any safety or efficacy issue related to the products, we are committed to the highest standards of quality and removed the products from the field as a precautionary measure. During the first quarter of 2018, we recorded a revenue reserve of $11 million, $0.9 million of which related to revenue recorded in prior periods, and adjustments during the balance of the year were immaterial. We also recorded an inventory charge for fiscal year 2018 of $0.8 million for the related non saleable inventory, and we incurred $0.3 million of expenses associated with the administration and remediation of the voluntary recall. During the fourth quarter of 2018, we resolved this matter and resumed shipment of these products, and as of December 31, 2018, all of the affected products had been returned to us without the need for any material change to the related reserves. As a result of this voluntary recall, revenue generated from the affected products during fiscal year 2018 declined between $1 million and $2 million as compared to fiscal year 2017. The following sections provide more specific information about our products and related activities 5 Orthobiologics Our Orthobiologics products primarily consist of viscosupplement and regenerative orthopedic products. These products are used in a wide range of treatments, from providing pain relief from osteoarthritis to regenerating damaged tissue such as cartilage. Osteoarthritis is a debilitating disease that causes pain, swelling, and restricted movement in joints. It occurs when the cartilage in a joint gradually deteriorates due to the effects of mechanical stress, which can be caused by a variety of factors, including the normal aging process. In an osteoarthritic joint, particular regions of the joint articulating surfaces are exposed to irregular forces, which results in the remodeling of tissue surfaces that disrupt the normal equilibrium or mechanical function. As osteoarthritis advances, the joint gradually loses its ability to regenerate cartilage tissue, and the cartilage layer attached to the b1 eventually deteriorates to the point that the b1 becomes exposed. Advanced osteoarthritis often requires surgery and the possible implantation of artificial joints. The current treatment options for osteoarthritis, prior to joint replacement surgery, include viscosupplements, analgesics, non steroidal anti inflammatory drugs, and steroid injections. Our viscosupplement franchise includes ORTHOVISC, MONOVISC, ORTHOVISC mini , and CINGAL. Our first viscosupplement product, ORTHOVISC, is a 3 injection osteoarthritis treatment regimen available in the United States, Canada, and other international markets throughout the world. ORTHOVISC has been marketed by us internationally since 1996, and it was approved for sale in the United States in 2004. MONOVISC is our second generation, single injection osteoarthritis treatment, and it is also available in the United States, Canada, and other international markets throughout the world. MONOVISC has been marketed by us internationally since 2008 and was approved by the FDA for sale in the United States in February 2014, with the related U.S. commercial introduction of the product in April 2014. In the United States, our viscosupplement franchise, consisting of our ORTHOVISC and MONOVISC products, continues to maintain the overall market leadership position. ORTHOVISC mini has been available in Europe since 2008, and it is designed for the treatment of osteoarthritis in small joints. CINGAL, our third generation single injection osteoarthritis product, combining the HA formulation utilized in MONOVISC with an active steroid comp1nt, is available in Canada, the European Union, and other international markets throughout the world. Commercial launch of this next generation viscosupplement was achieved in Canada during May 2016 and in the European Union during June 2016. For additional information about CINGAL in the United States, see the section capti1d Business Research and Development of Potential Products . In the United States, ORTHOVISC is indicated for the treatment of pain caused by osteoarthritis of the knee in patients who have failed to respond adequately to conservative, non pharmacologic therapy and to simple analgesics, such as acetaminophen. ORTHOVISC is a sterile, clear, viscous solution of hyaluronan dissolved in physiological saline and dispensed in a single use syringe. A complex sugar of the glycosaminoglycan family, hyaluronan is a high molecular weight polysaccharide composed of repeating disaccharide units of sodium glucuronate and N acetyl glucosamine. ORTHOVISC is injected into joints in a series of 3 intra articular injections 1 week apart. ORTHOVISC became available for sale in the United States on March 1, 2004, and it is marketed by DePuy Synthes Mitek Sports Medicine, a division of DePuy Orthopaedics, Inc. ( Mitek ) under the terms of an initial ten year licensing, distribution, supply, and marketing agreement which was entered into in December 2003 (the Mitek ORTHOVISC Agreement ). The Mitek ORTHOVISC Agreement has been extended for 2 additional five year terms, and it will now expire on December 20, 2023, unless it is further extended by Mitek. Outside of the U.S., we have a number of distribution relationships servicing international markets including Canada, Europe, the Middle East, Latin America, and Asia. We continue to seek to establish distribution relationships in other key markets. See the sections capti1d Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations Management Overview and Risk Factors . In the United States, MONOVISC is also indicated for the treatment of pain caused by osteoarthritis of the knee in patients who have failed to respond adequately to conservative, non pharmacologic therapy and to simple analgesics, such as acetaminophen. MONOVISC is a sterile, clear, viscous solution of partially cross linked sodium hyaluronate in a phosphate buffered saline solution. A treatment of MONOVISC is comprised of 1 injection of the product delivered directly into the affected joint. MONOVISC became available for sale in the United States in April 2014, and it is marketed by Mitek under the terms of a fifteen year licensing, distribution, supply, and marketing agreement, which was entered into on December 21, 2011 (the Mitek MONOVISC Agreement ). Outside of the United States, we have a number of distribution relationships servicing international markets including Canada, Europe, the Middle East, Latin America, Asia, Australia, and certain other international countries. We continue to seek to establish distribution relationships in other key markets. See the sections capti1d Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations Management Overview and Risk Factors. 6 In addition to the four viscosupplement products discussed above, we also offer several additional products used in connection with orthopedic regenerative medicine. These products are based on the HYAFF technology and are currently available in Europe, South America, Asia, and certain other international markets. They include HYALOFAST, a biodegradable support for human b1 marrow mesenchymal stem cells used for cartilage regeneration and as an adjunct for microfracture surgery; HYAL1CT, a resorbable knitted fabric mesh for use in orthopedic and trauma reconstructive procedures to maintain the relative position of engrafted b1 tissue or b1 fragments from comminuted fractures; and HYALOSS MATRIX, HYAFF fibers used to mix blood b1 grafts to form a paste for b1 regeneration. We also offer HYALOGLIDE, an ACP gel used in tenolysis treatment, with the potential for use in flexor tendon adhesion prevention and for use in the shoulder for prevention of adhesive capsulitis with additional clinical data. This product is commercialized through a ne2rk of distributors, primarily in Europe and the Middle East. We also received CE Mark approval in December 2016 for a product which utilizes our proprietary HA technology to treat pain associated with lateral epicondylitis, better known as tennis elbow. Outside of the United States, this product is marketed under the trade name ORTHOVISC T. Additionally, in the second quarter of 2016, we submitted an Investigational Device Exemption ( IDE ) to the FDA to conduct a Phase III clinical trial for this treatment, and the IDE was approved by the FDA in June 2016. In addition to these products, we also received 510(k) clearance for an injectable, HA based surgical b1 repair product in December 2017, which we intend to launch in the U.S. during 2019 utilizing the previously described hybrid commercial approach. In total, Orthobiologics products accounted for 89%, 87%, and 87% of our product revenue in 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively. Dermal Our dermal products consist of advanced wound care products, based on the HYAFF technology, and an aesthetic dermal filler, based on our proprietary chemically modified, cross linked HA technology. Products utilizing our HYAFF technology are used for the treatment of skin wounds, ranging from burns to diabetic ulcers. The products cover a variety of wound treatment solutions including debridement agents, advanced therapies to aid healing, and scaffolds used as skin substitutes. Leading products include HYALOMATRIX and HYALOFILL, for the treatment of complex wounds such as burns and ulcers. The dermal products are commercialized through a ne2rk of distributors, primarily in the United States, Europe, Latin America, and the Middle East. Products cleared for sale in the United States include HYALOMATRIX, HYALOFILL, HYALOGRAN, HYALOSAFE, and HYALOMATRIX 3D. In 2014, we entered into an agreement with Medline Industries, Inc. with a current expiration date of December 31, 2022 to commercialize HYALOMATRIX in the United States. Our aesthetic dermatology product is a dermal filler based on our proprietary, chemically modified, cross linked HA, and it is commercially available in select countries in the Middle East. Internationally, this product is marketed under the ELEVESS name. In the United States, the trade name is HYDRELLE, although the product is not currently marketed in the United States. Surgical Our surgical business consists of products used to prevent post surgical adhesions after abdominal pelvic, spinal, and ear, nose, and throat ( ENT ) surgeries. HYALOBARRIER is a clinically proven, post operative adhesion barrier for use in the abdominopelvic area. The product is currently commercialized in Europe, the Middle East, and certain African and Asian countries through a distribution ne2rk, but it is not approved for sale in the United States. Surgical adhesions occur when fibrous bands of tissues form between adjacent tissue layers during the wound healing process. Although surgeons attempt to minimize the formation of adhesions, they nevertheless occur quite frequently after surgery. Adhesions in the abdominal and pelvic cavity can cause particularly serious problems such as intestinal blockage following abdominal surgery and infertility following pelvic surgery. Fibrosis following spinal surgery can complicate re operation and may cause pain. 7 We also offer several products used in connection with the treatment of ENT disorders. The lead products are MEROGEL, a woven fleece nasal packing, and MEROGEL INJECTABLE, a thick, viscous hydrogel composed of cross linked hyaluronic acid a biocompatible agent that creates a moist wound healing environment. We have partnered with Medtronic XoMed, Inc. ( Medtronic ) for worldwide distribution of these ENT products. Other Our other products include our ophthalmic and veterinary products, which are legacy products and not a part of our core business. Our ophthalmic business includes injectable, high molecular weight HA products used as viscoelastic agents in ophthalmic surgical procedures such as cataract extraction and intraocular lens implantation. These products coat, lubricate, and protect sensitive tissue such as the endothelium, and they function to maintain the shape of the eye, thereby facilitating ophthalmic surgical procedures. Our veterinary product, HYVISC, is a high molecular weight injectable HA product for the treatment of joint dysfunction in horses due to non infectious synovitis associated with equine osteoarthritis. HYVISC has viscoelastic properties that lubricate and protect the tissues in horse joints. HYVISC is distributed by Boehringer Ingelheim Vetmedica, Inc. ( Boehringer ) in the United States and in selected countries in the Middle East. See Note 3 Revenue by Product Group, by Significant Customer and by Geographic Location; Geographic Information to our consolidated financial statements included elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K for a discussion regarding our segments and geographic sales. See also the section capti1d Risk Factors Risks Related to Our Commercialization Activities We experience quarterly sales volume variation, which makes our future results difficult to predict and makes period to period comparisons potentially not meaningful for a discussion regarding the effect that quarterly sales volume variation could have on our business and financial performance. See also the section capti1d Risk Factors Risks Related to Our Business and Competitive Position A significant portion of our revenues are derived from a small number of customers, the loss of which could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations for a discussion regarding our dependence on large volume customers and the effects that the loss of any such customer could have on our business and financial performance. See also the section capti1d Risk Factors Risks Related to Our Business and Industry Our manufacturing processes involve inherent risks, and disruption could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations for a discussion of the sources and availability of raw materials related to the manufacture of our products. Research and Development of Potential Products Our research and development efforts primarily consist of the development of new medical applications for our HA based technology, the management of clinical trials for certain product candidates, the preparation and processing of applications for regulatory approvals or clearances at all relevant stages of product development, and process development and scale up manufacturing activities for our existing and new products. Our development focus is orthopedic and regenerative medicines and includes products for tissue protection, repair, and regeneration. For the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, these expenses were $18.2 million, $18.8 million, and $10.7 million, respectively. We anticipate that we will continue to commit significant resources to, and increase our aggregate spending on, research and development activities, including in relation to preclinical activities and clinical trials, in the future. 8 Our third generation, single injection osteoarthritis product under development in the United States, CINGAL, which is composed of our proprietary cross linked HA material combined with an approved steroid and is designed to provide both short and long term pain relief to patients, is our lead pipeline product and a critical comp1nt of our growth strategy. We completed an initial CINGAL Phase III clinical trial, including the associated statistical analysis for 368 enrolled patients, during the fourth quarter of 2014 with data indicating that the product met all primary and secondary endpoints relative to placebo set forth for the trial. During the first half of 2015, we completed a CINGAL retreatment study with 242 patients who had participated in the Phase III clinical trial and reported safety data related to the retreatment study. This initial Phase III clinical trial and the associated retreatment study supported the Health Canada and CE Mark approval of the product, and the commercial launch of the product in both Canada and the European Union occurred in the second quarter of 2016. In the United States, after discussions with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration ( FDA ) related to the regulatory pathway for CINGAL, we conducted a formal meeting with the FDA Office of Combination Products ( OCP ) to present and discuss our data in September 2015, and we submitted a formal request for designation with OCP a month later. In its response to our formal request for designation, OCP assigned the product to the FDA Center for Drug Evaluation and Research ( CDER ) as the lead agency center for premarket review and regulation. We then held discussions with CDER to understand the requirements for submitting a New Drug Application ( NDA ) for CINGAL. We held a meeting with CDER in September 2016 to align on an approval framework and on submission requirements for this NDA for CINGAL, including the execution of an additional Phase III clinical trial to supplement our existing CINGAL pivotal study data. We submitted an Investigational New Drug Application ( IND ) in late 2016, and discussions with CDER indicated that they did not have objections to our clinical protocol design. As a result, we commenced work on this second Phase III clinical trial ( CINGAL 16 02 Study ) in the first quarter of 2017, and the first patient was treated in the second quarter of 2017. Enrollment of the 576 patients in this second Phase III clinical trial was completed during October 2017, and we completed the six month patient follow up in April 2018. We received and analyzed the data from the CINGAL 16 02 Study during the second quarter of 2018, and, while substantial pain reduction associated with CINGAL was evident at each measurement point, we determined based on statistical analysis that it did not meet the primary study endpoint of demonstrating a statistically significant difference in pain reduction between CINGAL and the approved steroid comp1nt of CINGAL at the six month time point. In the third quarter of 2017, we initiated an additional 3 month extended follow up study in conjunction with the CINGAL 16 02 Study to investigate the efficacy of CINGAL over this longer period. The first patients were enrolled in this follow up study in the fourth quarter of 2017 and we completed the nine month patient follow up in the third quarter of 2018. Given the totality of the results from our studies related to CINGAL, we have evaluated multiple strategies to optimize the potential U.S. regulatory pathway for the product. We recently met with FDA to discuss this potential approval pathway for CINGAL in the United States moving forward. In the meeting, FDA indicated that an additional Phase III clinical trial would be necessary to support U.S. marketing approval for CINGAL, and we are continuing to align with FDA on the parameters and requirements for this additional clinical trial, which we expect to commence once alignment is achieved. We have several research and development programs underway for new products, including for HYALOFAST (in the United States), an innovative product for cartilage tissue repair, and other early stage regenerative medicine development programs. HYALOFAST, which received CE Mark approval in September 2009, is commercially available in Europe and certain international countries. During the first quarter of 2015, we submitted an Investigational Device Exemption ( IDE ) for HYALOFAST to the FDA, which was approved in July 2015. We commenced patient enrollment in a clinical trial in December 2015, and we are advancing site initiations and patient enrollment activities. In the second quarter of 2016, a supplement to the HYALOFAST IDE was approved to expand the inclusion criteria for the clinical study, which was aimed at decreasing the time needed to complete the clinical trial. The previously described voluntary recall of certain production lots of our HYAFF based products did not impact the HYALOFAST clinical trial, as the product used in the clinical trial is not sourced from the affected production lots. Given the changing medical landscape with respect to the randomization arm for this trial, the microfracture procedure, we are actively pursuing alternative strategies to accelerate patient enrollment. In the third quarter of 2017, we submitted an application to the FDA for 510(k) clearance of an injectable, HA based surgical b1 repair product that is reabsorbed by the body and replaced by the growth of new b1 during the healing process. The 510(k) clearance was received from the FDA in December 2017, and we expect to make this b1 repair product commercially available in the United States during 2019 utilizing the previously described hybrid commercial approach. In addition to other early stage research and development initiatives we are currently undertaking, we are working to expand our regenerative medicine pipeline with a new product candidate in the form of an implant for rotator cuff repair utilizing our proprietary solid HA, which could be used to repair partial and full thickness rotator cuff tears. We finalized development of an initial product prototype during the fourth quarter of 2018, and we are performing important preclinical testing of and developing the surgical instrumentation for the potential product. We are also currently proceeding with other research and development programs, 1 of which utilizes our proprietary HA technology to treat pain associated with common repetitive overuse injuries, such as lateral epicondylitis, also known as tennis elbow. We submitted a CE Mark application for this treatment during the first quarter of 2016 and received a CE Mark for the treatment of pain associated with tennis elbow in December 2016. We began work towards a post market clinical study in relation to the CE Mark for this product in the fourth quarter of 2018. Outside of the United States, this product is marketed under the trade name ORTHOVISC T. Additionally, in the second quarter of 2016, we submitted an IDE to the FDA to conduct a Phase III clinical trial for this treatment, which was approved by the FDA in June 2016. We also have several other research and development programs underway focused on expanding the indications of our current products, including MONOVISC. Notwithstanding those internal programs, the previously disclosed program conducted and funded by Mitek seeking to expand MONOVISC indication to include treatment of pain associated with osteoarthritis of the hip was cancelled in the fourth quarter of 2018 after the performance of an independent interim analysis required by the related clinical protocol. During 2019, we will also be performing post market clinical work in relation to the CE Mark for MONOVISC. 9 In June 2015, we entered into an agreement with the Institute for Applied Life Sciences at the University of Massachusetts Amherst to collaborate on research to develop a therapy for rheumatoid arthritis. The purpose of this research was to develop a novel modality for the treatment of rheumatoid arthritis. The agreement with the University of Massachusetts Amherst was extended in January 2018, and it was terminated in October 2018 after discussions between the parties. In January 2018, we entered into an agreement with the University of Liverpool to develop an injectable mesenchymal stem cell therapy for the treatment of age related osteoarthritis with the goal of bringing a therapeutics candidate through clinical trials to market to meet an unmet therapeutic need. We are currently in the preclinical phase of this program and aim to finalize proof of concept during the second quarter of 2020. Our research and development efforts may not be successful in (1) developing our existing product candidates, (2) expanding the therapeutic applications of our existing products, or (3) resulting in new applications for our HA technology. There is also a risk that we may choose not to pursue development of potential product candidates. We may not be able to obtain regulatory approval for any new applications we develop. Furthermore, even if all regulatory approvals are obtained, there can be no assurances that we will achieve meaningful sales of such products or applications. See also the section capti1d Risk Factors Risks Related to Our Product Development and Regulatory Compliance Failure to obtain, or any delay in obtaining, FDA or other U.S. and foreign governmental approvals for our products may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. for a discussion regarding the impact of government regulations on our product development activities. Patent and Proprietary Rights Our products and trademarks, including our corporate name, product names, and logos, are proprietary. We rely on a combination of patent protection, trade secrets and trademark laws, license agreements, and confidentiality and other contractual provisions to protect our proprietary information. We have a policy of seeking patent protection for patentable aspects of our proprietary technology. In the United States, we own 19 patents, 1 of which is co owned with other parties, license 10 patents, and have 4 patent applications currently pending. These U.S. patents have expiration dates through 2030. Internationally, we own 181 patents, 7 of which are co owned with other parties, license 71 patents, and have 29 patent applications currently pending. Outside of the United States, we own, co own, license, or have filed for patents in 39 jurisdictions. Our international patents have expiration dates through 2032 In 2018, we were granted 29 new patents in Austria, Czech Republic, Denmark, France, Germany, Great Britain, Ireland, Italy, the Netherlands, Poland, Spain, Sweden, and Switzerland. Many of these patents, including all licensed patents, belong to the Anika S.r.l. patent estate, which is extensive and partly intertwined with its former parent company Fidia Farmaceutici S.p.A. ( Fidia ) through a patent licensing agreement that provides Anika S.r.l. with access to certain of Fidia patents to the extent required to support Anika S.r.l. products. In 2018, 3 of the patents belonging to the Anika S.r.l. patent estate expired in the United States, and 13 expired internationally. We intend to seek patent protection for products and processes developed in the course of our activities when we believe such protection is in our best interests and when the cost of seeking such protection is not inordinate relative to the potential benefits. Other entities have filed patent applications for, or have been issued patents concerning, various aspects of HA related products or processes. In addition, the products or processes we develop may infringe the patent rights of others in the future. Any such infringement may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. 10 We rely upon trade secrets and proprietary know how for certain non patented aspects of our technology. To protect such information, we require certain customers and vendors, and all employees, consultants, and licensees to enter into confidentiality agreements limiting the disclosure and use of such information. These agreements, however, may not provide adequate protection. See also the section capti1d Risk Factors Risks Related to Our Intellectual Property We may be unable to adequately protect our intellectual property rights, which could have a material impact on our business and future financial results for a discussion of the risks we face with respect to protecting intellectual property we develop. We have granted Mitek an exclusive and non transferable, royalty bearing license to develop, commercialize, and sell ORTHOVISC and MONOVISC in the United States pursuant to the Mitek ORTHOVISC Agreement and the Mitek MONOVISC Agreement. These agreements include a license to manufacture and have manufactured such products in the event that we are unable to supply Mitek with ORTHOVISC or MONOVISC in accordance with the terms of the relevant agreement. We have also granted Mitek the exclusive, royalty free right to use the trademarks ORTHOVISC and MONOVISC in connection with the marketing, distribution, and sale of the licensed products within the United States. Government Regulation The clinical development, manufacturing, and marketing of our products are subject to governmental regulation in the United States, the European Union, and other territories worldwide. Various statutes, regulations and interpretations thereof, directives, and guidelines, including the Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act in the United States, govern the development, design, non clinical and clinical research, testing, manufacture, safety, efficacy, labeling, packaging, storage, record keeping, premarket clearance or approval, adverse event reporting, advertising, and promotion of our products. Product development and approval within these various regulatory frameworks takes a number of years and involves the expenditure of substantial resources. Pharmaceutical and medical device manufacturers are also inspected regularly by the FDA and other applicable regulatory bodies. Medical products regulated by the FDA are generally classified as drugs, biologics, or medical devices, and the current classification standards for our current or future may be altered over time. Drugs and biologic products undergo rigorous preclinical testing prior to beginning clinical trials. Clinical trials for new drugs or biologic products include Phase I trials in healthy volunteers to understand safety, dosage tolerance, and pharmacokinetics, Phase II trials in a limited patient population to identify initial efficacy and side effects, and Phase III pivotal trials to statistically evaluate the safety and efficacy of the product. Medical devices intended for human use are classified into 3 categories (Class I, II or III) on the basis of the controls deemed reasonably necessary by the FDA to assure their safety and effectiveness. Class II devices are cleared for marketing under the premarket notification 510(k) regulatory pathway, which may include clinical testing. Class III devices require pre market approval based on valid scientific evidence of safety and effectiveness, including evidence elicited through appropriate clinical testing. The failure to adequately demonstrate the quality, safety, and efficacy of a product under development can delay or prevent regulatory approval of the product. In order to gain marketing approval, we must submit to the relevant regulatory authority for review information on the quality aspects of the product as well as the non clinical and clinical data. The FDA undertakes this review in the United States. In the European Union, medical devices must be CE Marked in order to be marketed. CE marking a device involves working with a Notified Body, and in some cases a Competent Authority, to demonstrate that the device meets all applicable requirements of the Medical Devices Directive and that our Quality Management System is compliant. Drug approval in the European Union follows 1 of several possible processes (i) a centralized procedure involving members of the European Medicines Agency Committee for Medicinal Products for Human Use; (ii) a mutual recognition procedure in which an individual country's regulatory agency approves the product followed by mutual recognition of this approval by regulatory agencies of other countries; or (iii) a decentralized procedure in which the approval is sought through the regulatory agencies of multiple countries at the same time. 11 Approval timelines can range from several months to several years, or applications can be denied entirely. Product or product comp1nt classifications as drugs, biologics, or medical devices may change over time due to new regulations or augmented interpretation of data or current regulations. The approval process can be affected by a number of factors. For example, additional studies or clinical trials may be requested during the review, which may delay marketing approval and involve unbudgeted costs. As a condition of approval, the regulatory agency may require post marketing surveillance to monitor for adverse effects, and may require other additional studies, as it deems appropriate. After approval for an initial indication, further clinical studies are generally necessary to gain approval for any additional indications. The terms of any approval, including labeling content, may be more restrictive than expected and could affect the marketability of a product. As a condition of approval, the relevant regulatory agency requires that the product continues to meet applicable regulatory requirements related to quality, safety, and efficacy, and it requires strict procedures to monitor and report any adverse effects. Where adverse effects occur or may occur, the regulatory agency may require additional studies or changes to the labeling. Compelling new adverse data may result in a product approval being withdrawn at any stage following review by an agency and discussion with the product manufacturer. The branch of the FDA responsible for product marketing oversight routinely reviews company marketing practices and also may impose pre clearance requirements on materials intended for use in marketing of approved drug products. We are also subject to various U.S. federal and state laws pertaining to healthcare fraud and abuse, including anti kickback and false claims laws. Similar review and regulation of advertising and marketing practices exists in the other geographic areas where we operate. The FDA has broad regulatory compliance and enforcement powers. If the FDA determines that we failed to comply with applicable regulatory requirements, it can take a variety of compliance or enforcement actions, including, without limitation, issuing an FDA Form 483 notice of inspectional observations or a warning letter, imposing civil m1y penalties, suspending or delaying issuance of approvals, requiring product recall, imposing a total or partial shutdown of production, withdrawal of approvals or clearances already granted, pursuing product seizures, consent decrees or other injunctive relief, or criminal prosecution through the Department of Justice. The FDA can also require us to repair, replace, or refund the cost of products that we manufactured or distributed. Outside the United States, regulatory agencies may exert a range of similar powers. We are also subject to various laws and regulations concerning data privacy. Changing privacy laws in the United States, Europe, Brazil and elsewhere, including the adoption by the European Union of the General Data Protection Regulation ( GDPR ) effective in May 2018, create new individual privacy rights and impose increased obligations on companies handling personal data. The GDPR, which is wide ranging in scope, imposes several requirements relating to the consent of the individuals to whom the personal data relates, the information provided to the individuals, the security and confidentiality of the personal data, data breach notification, and the use of third party processors in connection with the processing of the personal data. The GDPR also imposes strict rules on the transfer of personal data out of the E.U. to the U.S. and empowers enforcement agencies to impose large penalties for noncompliance, including the potential for fines of up to 20 million or 4% of the annual global revenues of the infringer, whichever is greater. See also the sections capti1d Risk Factors Risks Related to Our Product Development and Regulatory Compliance Failure to obtain, or any delay in obtaining, FDA or other U.S. and foreign governmental approvals for our products may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations, Risk Factors Risks Related to Our Product Development and Regulatory Compliance Once obtained, we cannot guarantee that FDA or international product approvals will not be withdrawn or that relevant agencies will not require other corrective action, and any withdrawal or corrective action could materially affect our business and financial results, Risk Factors Risks Related to Our Product Development and Regulatory Compliance Our operations and products are subject to extensive regulation, compliance with which is costly and time consuming, and our failure to comply may result in substantial penalties, including recalls of our products, Risk Factors Risks Related to Our Product Development and Regulatory Compliance Any changes in FDA or international regulations related to product approval, including those that apply retroactively, could adversely affect our competitive position and materially affect our business and financial results, and Risk Factors Risks Related to Our Product Development and Regulatory Compliance We are subject to various healthcare laws and regulations, and any failure to comply with applicable laws could subject us to significant liability and harm our business for a discussion regarding the potential impact of government regulations on our business and financial results. 12 Competition We compete with many companies including large pharmaceutical firms and specialized medical products companies across all of our product lines. Many of these companies have substantially greater financial resources, larger research and development staffs, more extensive marketing and manufacturing organizations, and more experience in the regulatory processes than we have. We also compete with academic institutions, government agencies, and other research organizations, which may be involved in the research and development and commercialization of products. Many of our competitors also compete against us in securing relationships with collaborators for their research and development and commercialization programs. We compete with other market participants primarily on the efficacy of our products, our products reputation for safety, our focus on HA based products, and the breadth of our HA based product portfolio. Other factors that impact competition in our industry are the timing and scope of regulatory approvals, the availability of raw material and finished product supply, marketing and sales capability, reimbursement coverage, product pricing, and patent protection. Some of the principal factors that may affect our ability to compete in the HA development and commercialization markets include The quality and breadth of our continued development of our technology portfolio; Our ability to complete successful clinical studies and obtain FDA marketing and foreign regulatory approvals prior to our competitors; The execution by our key partners of their commercial strategies for our products and our ability to manage our relationships with those key partners; The successful execution of our commercial strategies, including our hybrid commercial approach; Our ability to recruit and retain skilled employees; and The availability of capital resources to fund strategic activities related to the significant expansion of our business or product portfolio, including through acquisitions of third parties or certain assets. We are aware of several companies that are developing and or marketing products utilizing HA for a variety of human applications. In some cases, competitors have already obtained product approvals, submitted applications for approval, or commenced human clinical studies, either in the United States or in certain foreign countries. All of our products face substantial competition. There exist major worldwide competing products, made from HA and other materials, for use in orthopedics, surgical adhesion prevention, advanced wound care, ENT, cosmetic dermatology, ophthalmic surgery, and the treatment of equine osteoarthritis. There is a risk that we will be unable to compete effectively against our current or future competitors. Additionally, legislation and regulation aimed at curbing rising healthcare costs has resulted in a consolidation trend in the healthcare industry to create larger companies, including hospitals, with greater market power. In turn, this has led to greater and more intense competition in the provision of products and services to market participants. Important market makers, like group purchasing organizations and integrated delivery ne2rks, have increased their negotiating leverage, and if these market makers demand significant price concessions or if we are excluded as a supplier by these market makers, our product revenue could be adversely impacted. See also the sections capti1d Risk Factors Risks Related to Our Business and Competitive Position Substantial competition could materially affect our financial performance, Risk Factors Risks Related to Our Business and Competitive Position We are dependent upon marketing and distribution partners and the failure to maintain strategic alliances on acceptable terms will have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations , Risk Factors Risks Related to Our Commercialization Activities Our business may be adversely affected if consolidation in the healthcare industry leads to demand for price concessions or if we are excluded from being a supplier by a group purchasing organization or similar entity , Risk Factors Risks Related to Our Business and Industry We actively explore acquisitions as a part of our future growth strategy, which exposes us to a variety of risks that could adversely affect our business operations , and Risk Factors Risks Related to Our Business and Industry Attractive acquisition opportunities may not be available to us for additional discussion of the impact competition could have on our business and financial results. 13 Employees As of December 31, 2018, we had 133 employees, 24 of whom were located outside the United States. We consider our relations with our employees to be good. N1 of our U.S. employees are represented by labor unions, but certain employees based in Italy are represented by unions, adding complexity and additional risks to the wage and employment decision processes. Environmental Laws We believe that we are in compliance with all foreign, federal, state, and local environmental regulations with respect to our manufacturing facilities and that the cost of ongoing compliance with such regulations does not have a material effect on our operations. Product Liability The testing, marketing, and sale of human health care products entails an inherent risk of allegations of product liability, and we cannot assure that substantial product liability claims will not be asserted against us. Although we have not received any material product liability claims to date and have coverage under our insurance policy of $5.0 million per occurrence and $5.0 million in the aggregate, we cannot assure that if material claims arise in the future, our insurance will be adequate to cover all situations. Moreover, we cannot assure that such insurance, or additional insurance, if required, will be available in the future or, if available, will be available on commercially reasonable terms. Any product liability claim, if successful, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operation. Available Information Our Annual Reports on Form 10 K, including our consolidated financial statements, Quarterly Reports on Form 10 Q, Current Reports on Form 8 K, and other information, including amendments and exhibits to such reports, filed or furnished pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, are available free of charge in the SEC Filings section of our website located at http www.anikatherapeutics.com, as soon as reasonably practicable after the reports are filed with or furnished to the SEC. The information on our website is not part of this Annual Report on Form 10 K. Reports filed with the SEC may be viewed at www.sec.gov. ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS Our operating results and financial condition have varied in the past and could vary significantly in the future depending on a number of factors. You should consider carefully the risks and uncertainties described below, in addition to the other information contained in this Annual Report on Form 10 K, before deciding whether to purchase our common stock. If any of the following risks actually occurs, our business, financial condition, results of operations, and future prospects could be materially and adversely affected. In that event, the trading price of our common stock could decline, and you could lose part or all of your investment. 14 Risks Related to Our Business and Competitive Position Our financial performance depends on the continued sales growth and increasing demand for our products and we may not be able to successfully manage the expansion of our operations. Our future success depends on substantial growth in product sales. There can be no assurance that such growth can be achieved or, if achieved, sustained. There can be no assurance that, even if substantial growth in product sales and the demand for our products is achieved, we will be able to Maintain and develop the necessary manufacturing capabilities; Develop and successfully implement appropriate new commercial models to generate increased sales or obtain the assistance of additional marketing partners; Attract, retain, and integrate required key personnel; and Implement the financial, accounting, and management systems needed to manage our overall business and growing demand for our products. Our failure to successfully manage future growth could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Substantial competition could materially affect our financial performance. We compete with many companies, including large pharmaceutical companies, specialized medical products companies, and healthcare companies. Many of these companies have substantially greater financial resources, larger research and development staffs, more extensive intellectual technology portfolios, more extensive marketing and manufacturing organizations, and more experience in the regulatory process than us. We also compete with academic institutions, government agencies, and other research organizations that may be involved in research, development, and commercialization of products similar to our own. Because a number of companies are developing or have developed HA products for similar applications and have received FDA approval, the successful commercialization of a particular product will depend in part upon our ability to complete clinical studies and obtain FDA marketing and foreign regulatory approvals prior to our competitors, or, if regulatory approval is not obtained prior to our competitors, to identify markets for our products that may be sufficient to permit meaningful sales of our products. For example, we are aware of several companies that are developing and or marketing products utilizing HA for a variety of human applications. In some cases, competitors have already obtained product approvals, submitted applications for approval, or have commenced human clinical studies, either in the United States or in certain foreign countries. For example, certain HA products made by our competitors for the treatment of osteoarthritis in the knee received FDA approval before ours and have been marketed in the United States since 1997, as well as select markets in Canada, Europe, and other countries. In addition, the market for our current or future products could be adversely impacted if disruptive technologies or modalities are developed by third parties. There can be no assurance that we will be able to compete against current or future competitors or that competition will not have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. A significant portion of our revenues are derived from a small number of customers, the loss of which could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. We have historically derived the majority of our revenues from a small number of customers who resell our products to end users, and most of these customers are significantly larger companies than us. For the year ended December 31, 2018, five customers accounted for 86% of product revenue, with Mitek al1 accounting for 73% of product revenue. We expect to continue to be dependent on a small number of large customers, especially Mitek, for the majority of our revenues in the near term future. The failure of these customers to purchase our products in the amounts they historically have or in amounts that we expect would seriously harm our business. In addition, if present and future customers terminate their purchasing arrangements with us, significantly reduce or delay their orders, or seek to renegotiate their agreements on terms less favorable to us, our business, financial condition, and results of operations will be adversely affected. If we accept terms less favorable than the terms of the current agreements, such renegotiations may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and or results of operations. Furthermore, in any future negotiations we may be subject to the perceived or actual leverage that these customers may have given their relative size and importance to us. Any termination, change, reduction, or delay in orders could seriously harm our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Accordingly, unless and until we diversify and expand our customer base, or develop alternative commercial strategies, our future success will significantly depend upon the timing and size of future purchases by our largest customers, and the financial and operational success of these customers. The loss of any 1 of our major customers or the delay of significant orders from such customers, even if only temporary, could reduce or delay our recognition of revenues, harm our reputation in the industry, and reduce our ability to accurately predict cash flow, and, as a consequence, it could seriously harm our business, financial condition, and results of operations. 15 Our license agreements with Mitek provide substantial control of the U.S. marketing and development of MONOVISC and ORTHOVISC to Mitek, and Mitek actions could have a material impact on our business, financial condition and results of operations. The Mitek MONOVISC Agreement and Mitek ORTHOVISC Agreement provide Mitek with, among other things, the exclusive right to market and sell MONOVISC and ORTHOVISC in the United States, unilateral decision making authority over the sale, price, and promotion of MONOVISC and ORTHOVISC, substantial control over the future development of MONOVISC and ORTHOVISC related to the treatment of pain associated with osteoarthritis, a license to manufacture and have manufactured such products in the event that we are unable to supply Mitek with ORTHOVISC or MONOVISC in accordance with the terms of the relevant agreement, and certain rights of first refusal with respect to future products we develop for the treatment of pain associated with osteoarthritis. In exchange, Mitek pays us a transfer price calculated with reference to historical end user prices in the market and a fixed royalty on their net product sales. As Mitek accounts for a large percentage of our yearly revenue and has unilateral decision making authority over in market activities, including end user pricing and discounts, reimbursement strategy, and overall promotion strategy, actions taken by Mitek could impact our ability to predict and generate revenue and have a material impact on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. We are dependent upon marketing and distribution partners and the failure to maintain strategic alliances on acceptable terms will have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Though we intend to implement a hybrid commercial approach in the United States in the near term and evaluate future opportunities for the optimal commercial approach, our success will remain dependent, in part, upon the efforts of our marketing and distribution partners and the terms and conditions of our relationships with such partners. 1 partner, Mitek accounted for 73% of our product revenue in fiscal year 2018. We cannot assure you that our partners, including Mitek, will not seek to renegotiate their current agreements on terms less favorable to us or terminate such agreements. A failure to renew these partnerships on terms satisfactory to us, or at all, could result in a material adverse effect on our operating results. We continue to seek to establish long term distribution relationships in regions and countries not covered by existing agreements, and we may need to obtain the assistance of additional marketing partners to bring new and existing products to market and to replace certain marketing partners. There can be no assurance that we will be able to identify or engage appropriate distribution or collaboration partners or effectively transition to any such new partnerships. The failure to establish strategic partnerships for the marketing and distribution of our products on acceptable terms and within our planned timeframes could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. As our international sales and operations grow, we could become increasingly subject to additional economic, political, and other risks that could harm our business. Since we manufacture our products for sale worldwide, our business is subject to risks associated with doing business internationally. During the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016, 19%, 20%, and 19%, respectively, of our product sales were to international distributors. We continue to be subject to a variety of risks, which could cause fluctuations in the results of our international and domestic operations. These risks include The impact of recessions and other economic conditions in economies, including Europe in particular, outside the United States; Instability of foreign economic, political, and labor conditions; 16 Unfavorable labor regulations applicable to our European operations, such as severance and the unenforceability of non competition agreements in the European Union; The impact of strikes, work stoppages, work slowdowns, grievances, complaints, claims of unfair labor practices, or other collective bargaining disputes; Difficulties in complying with restrictions imposed by regulatory or market requirements, tariffs, or other trade barriers or by U.S. export laws; Imposition of government controls limiting the volume of international sales; Longer accounts receivable payment cycles; Potentially adverse tax consequences, including, if required or applicable, difficulties transferring funds generated in non U.S. jurisdictions to the United States in a tax efficient manner; Difficulties in protecting intellectual property, especially in international jurisdictions; Difficulties in managing international operations; and Burdens of complying with a wide variety of foreign laws. Our success depends, in part, on our ability to anticipate and address these and any new risks. We cannot guarantee that these or other factors will not adversely affect our business or operating results. Risks Related to Our Commercialization Activities We cannot be certain that we will be successful or timely in implementing changes to our current commercial model in the United States, including the hybrid commercial approach we intend to utilize for the commercialization of our injectable, HA based surgical b1 repair product and certain potential future products, and our failure to do so could negatively impact our business and financial results. For near term opportunities in the U.S. market, including for our injectable, HA based surgical b1 repair product, we intend to utilize hybrid commercial approach that would see us balance a small direct model with an optimal form of strategic partnership. For longer term future products in the U.S. market, we intend to evaluate the appropriate commercial model for each on a case by case basis, based on market dynamics and other factors. These models could include direct sales, distribution partnerships, or a hybrid of those forms. We cannot be certain that we will be successful in implementing these models, including the hybrid commercial approach, as we may not be able to attract or retain the sophisticated personnel required for such approach, to identify or negotiate favorable or acceptable terms with a desirable strategic partner, to timely execute on our strategies, or to generate meaningful sales of our products as a result of other market dynamics. Our failure to successfully or timely augment our current commercial model could have an adverse material effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. We are facing a delay in the pathway to commercialize our CINGAL product in the United States, and we may face other unforeseen difficulties and delays in achieving regulatory approval for CINGAL, which could affect our business and financial results. In the second quarter of 2018, we received and analyzed the results of our second Phase III clinical trial for CINGAL and found that, while substantial pain reduction associated with CINGAL was evident at each measurement point, the data did not meet the primary study endpoint of demonstrating a statistically significant difference in pain reduction between CINGAL and the approved steroid comp1nt of CINGAL at the six month time point. After completing the analysis of the data related to the totality of our studies for CINGAL, we recently met with FDA to discuss a potential approval pathway for CINGAL in the United States moving forward. In the meeting, FDA indicated that an additional Phase III clinical trial would be necessary to support U.S. marketing approval for CINGAL, and we are continuing to align with FDA on the parameters and requirements for this additional clinical trial, which we expect to commence once alignment is achieved. Because these results or other unforeseen future developments could have a substantial negative impact on the timeline for and the cost associated with a potential CINGAL regulatory approval, if any, our overall business condition, financial results, and competitive position could be affected. 17 We must achieve market acceptance of our products in order to be successful in the future. Our success will depend in part upon the acceptance of our existing and future products by the medical community, hospitals, physicians, other health care providers, third party payers, and end users. Such acceptance may depend upon the extent to which the medical community and end users perceive our products as safer, more effective, or more cost competitive than other similar products. Ultimately, for our new products to gain general market acceptance, it may also be necessary for us to develop marketing partners or viable commercial strategies for the distribution of our products. There can be no assurance that our new products will achieve significant market acceptance on a timely basis, or at all. Failure of some or all of our future products to achieve significant market acceptance could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Sales of our products are largely dependent upon third party reimbursement and our performance may be harmed by health care cost containment initiatives or decisions of individual third party payers. In the United States and other foreign markets, health care providers, such as hospitals and physicians, that purchase health care products, such as our products, generally rely on third party payers, including Medicare, Medicaid, and other health insurance and managed care plans, to reimburse all or part of the cost of the health care product. We have generally depended upon the distributors of our products to secure reimbursement and reimbursement approvals. Reimbursement by third party payers, both in the United States and internationally, may depend on a number of factors, including the individual payer determination that the use of our products is clinically useful and cost effective, medically necessary, and not experimental or investigational. Since reimbursement approval is required from each payer individually, seeking such approvals can be a time consuming and costly process which, in the future, could require us or our marketing partners to provide supporting scientific, clinical, and cost effectiveness data for the use of our products to each payer separately. Significant uncertainty exists as to the reimbursement status of newly approved health care products, and any failure or delay in obtaining reimbursement approvals can negatively impact sales of our new products. In addition, we cannot be certain that payers who currently provide reimbursement for our products will continue to provide such reimbursement in the future, and such payer decisions could negatively impact the sales of our current or future products. In addition, third party payers are increasingly attempting to contain the costs of health care products and services by limiting both coverage and the level of reimbursement for new therapeutic products and by refusing, in some cases, to provide coverage for uses of approved products for disease indications for which the FDA, or the applicable foreign regulatory agency, has granted marketing approval. Also, the U.S. Congress, certain state legislatures, and certain foreign governments and regulatory agencies have considered reforms, including, among other Item, the potential repeal of the Affordable Care Act in the United States, which may affect current reimbursement practices and create additional uncertainty about the pricing of our products, including the potential implementation of controls on health care spending through limitations on the growth of Medicare and Medicaid spending. There can be no assurance that third party reimbursement coverage will be available or adequate for any products or services developed by us. Outside the United States, the success of our products is also dependent in part upon the availability of reimbursement and health care payment systems. Domestic and international reimbursement laws and regulations may change from time to time. Lack of adequate coverage and reimbursement provided by governments and other third party payers for our products and services, including continuing coverage for MONOVISC and ORTHOVISC in the United States, and any change of classification by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for ORTHOVISC and MONOVISC, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. 18 Our business may be adversely affected if consolidation in the healthcare industry leads to demand for price concessions or if we are excluded from being a supplier by a group purchasing organization or similar entity. Because healthcare costs have risen significantly over the past decade, numerous initiatives and reforms have been launched by legislators, regulators, and third party payers to curb these costs. As a result, there has been a consolidation trend in the healthcare industry to create larger companies, including hospitals, with greater market power. As the healthcare industry consolidates, competition to provide products and services to industry participants has become and may continue to become more intense. This may result in greater pricing pressures and the exclusion of certain suppliers from important markets as group purchasing organizations, independent delivery ne2rks, and large single accounts continue to use their market power to consolidate purchasing decisions. If a group purchasing organization excludes us from being 1 of their suppliers, our net sales could be adversely impacted. We expect that market demand, government regulation, third party reimbursement policies, and societal pressures will continue to change the worldwide healthcare industry, which may exert further downward pressure on the prices of our products. We experience quarterly sales volume variation, which makes our future results difficult to predict and makes period to period comparisons potentially not meaningful. We experience quarterly fluctuations in our products sales as a result of multiple factors, many of which are outside of our control. These quarterly fluctuations create uncertainty as to the volume of sales that we may achieve in a given period. As a result, comparing our operating results on a period to period basis might not be meaningful. You should not rely on our past results as an indication of our future performance. Our operating results could be disproportionately affected by a reduction in revenue because a proportionately smaller amount of our expenses varies with our revenue. As a result, our quarterly operating results are difficult to predict, even in the near term. Risks Related to Our Product Development and Regulatory Compliance Failure to obtain, or any delay in obtaining, FDA or other U.S. and foreign governmental approvals for our products may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Several of our current products, and any future products we may develop, will require clinical trials to determine their safety and efficacy for United States and international marketing approval by regulatory bodies, including the FDA. Product development and approval within the FDA framework takes a number of years and involves the expenditure of substantial resources. There can be no assurance that the FDA will accept submissions related to our new products or the expansion of the indications of our current products, and, even if submissions are accepted, there can be no guarantee that the FDA will grant approval for our new products, including CINGAL, HYALOFAST, or other line extensions of our current products, or for the expansion of indications of our current products on a timely basis, if at all. In addition to regulations enforced by the FDA, we are subject to other existing and future federal, state, local, and foreign regulations applicable to product approval, which may vary significantly across jurisdictions. Additional approval of existing products may be required when changes to such products may affect the safety and effectiveness, including for new indications for use, labeling changes, process or manufacturing changes, the use of a different facility to manufacture, process or package the device, and changes in performance or design specifications. Failure to obtain regulatory approvals of our products, including any changes to existing products, could have an adverse material impact on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Even if ultimately granted, FDA and international regulatory approvals may be subject to significant, unanticipated delays throughout the regulatory approval process. Internally, we make assumptions regarding product approval timelines, both in the United States and internationally, in our business planning, and any delay in approval could materially affect our competitive position in the relevant product market and our projections related to future business results. We cannot be certain that product approvals, both in the United States and internationally, will not include significant limitations on the product indications, and other claims sought for use, under which the products may be marketed. The relevant approval or clearance may also include other significant conditions of approval such as post market testing, tracking, or surveillance requirements. Any of these factors could significantly impact our competitive position in relation to such products and could have a negative impact on the sales of such products. 19 Once obtained, we cannot guarantee that FDA or international product approvals will not be withdrawn or that relevant agencies will not require other corrective action, and any withdrawal or corrective action could materially affect our business and financial results. Once obtained, marketing approval can be withdrawn by the FDA or comparable foreign regulatory agencies for a number of reasons, including the failure to comply with ongoing regulatory requirements or the occurrence of unforeseen problems following initial approval. Regulatory authorities could also limit or prevent the manufacture or distribution of our products. Any regulatory limitations on the use of our products or any withdrawal or suspension of approval or rescission of approval by the FDA or a comparable foreign regulatory agency could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Our operations and products are subject to extensive regulation, compliance with which is costly and time consuming, and our failure to comply may result in substantial penalties, including recalls of our products. The FDA and foreign regulatory bodies impose extensive regulations applicable to our operations and products, including regulations governing product standards, packing requirements, labeling requirements, quality system and manufacturing requirements, import restrictions, tariff regulations, duties, and tax requirements. We cannot assure you that we will be able to achieve and maintain compliance required for FDA, CE marking, or other foreign regulatory approvals for any or all of our operations and products or that we will be able to produce our products in a timely and profitable manner while complying with applicable requirements. Failure to comply with applicable regulatory requirements could result in substantial penalties, including warning letters, fines, injunctions, civil penalties, seizure of products, total or partial suspension of production, refusal to grant pre market clearance or pre market approval for devices or drugs, withdrawal of approvals, and criminal prosecution. Additionally, regulatory authorities have the power to require the recall of our products. It also might be necessary for us, in applicable circumstances, to initiate a voluntary recall per regulatory requirements of 1 or several of our products. The imposition of any of the foregoing penalties, whether voluntarily or involuntary, could have a material negative impact on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Any changes in FDA or international regulations related to product approval or approval renewal, including those currently under consideration by FDA or those that apply retroactively, could adversely affect our competitive position and materially affect our business and financial results. FDA and foreign regulations depend heavily on administrative interpretation, and we cannot assure you that future interpretations made by the FDA or other regulatory bodies, with possible retroactive effect, will not adversely affect us. Additionally, any changes, whether in interpretation or substance, in existing regulations or policies, or any future adoption of new regulations or policies by relevant regulatory bodies, could prevent or delay approval of our products. In the event our future, or current, products, including HA generally, are classified, or re classified, as human drugs, combination products, or biologics by the FDA or an applicable international regulatory body, the applicable review process related to such products is typically substantially longer and substantially more expensive than the review process to which they are currently subject as medical devices. In 2018, FDA publicly indicated its intent to consider HA products for certain indications for regulation as a drug and has indicated that industry should submit new products or indication expansions to the OCP to designate the appropriate FDA office for review. There exists uncertainty with respect to the final interpretation, implementation, and consequences of this development, and this or any other potential regulatory changes in approach or interpretation similar in substance to those menti1d in this paragraph and affecting our products could materially impact our competitive position, business, and financial results. Additionally, the implementation of the new European Medical Device Regulation ( EU MDR ), set to take full effect in 2020, is expected to change several aspects of the existing regulatory framework in Europe. Specifically, the EU MDR will require changes in the clinical evidence required for medical devices, post market clinical follow up evidence, annual reporting of safety information for Class III products, and bi annual reporting for Class II products, Unique Device Identification ( UDI ) for all products, submission of core data elements to a European UDI database prior to placement of a device on the market, reclassification of medical devices, and multiple other labeling changes. Approvals for certain of our currently marketed products could be curtailed or withdrawn as a result of the implementation of the EU MDR, and acquiring approvals for new products could be more challenging and costly. For example, the CE Mark indication for MONOVISC of the treatment of pain associated with osteoarthritis in all synovial joints was limited to the knee joint by our notified body as a result of the EU MDR, pending our generation of adequate data to support the broader indication previously granted. We do not expect this limitation to have a material impact on MONOVISC revenue generation, but compliance with this and any other requirements could be time consuming and costly, and our failure to comply may subject us to significant liabilities, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operation. 20 We may rely on third parties to support certain aspects of our clinical trials. If these third parties do not successfully carry out their contractual duties or meet expected deadlines, we may not be able to obtain regulatory approval or commercialize our products, and our business could be substantially harmed. We have hired experienced clinical development and regulatory staff, and we have also retained the services of knowledgeable external service providers, including consultants and clinical research organizations, to develop and supervise our clinical trials and regulatory processes. Despite our internal investment in staffing, we will remain dependent upon these third party contract research organizations to carry out portions of our clinical and preclinical research studies for the foreseeable future. As a result, we have had and will have less control over the conduct of the clinical trials, the timing and completion of the trials, the required reporting of adverse events, and the management of data developed through the trials than would be the case if we were relying entirely on our own staff. Outside parties may have staffing difficulties, may undergo changes in priorities or may become financially distressed, adversely affecting their willingness or ability to conduct our trials. Failure by these third parties to comply with regulatory requirements or to meet timing expectations may require us to repeat clinical or preclinical trials, which would delay the regulatory approval process, or require substantial unexpected expenditures. We are subject to various healthcare laws and regulations, and any failure to comply with applicable laws could subject us to significant liability and harm our business. Our business involves substantial interaction and collaboration with healthcare professionals, including physician consultants, clinical investigators, and actual and potential customers. These relationships are subject to federal and state healthcare laws, as well as equivalent foreign regulations. These statutes and regulations include, without limitation, false claims laws, anti kickback regulations, the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, and the Physician Payments Sunshine Act. Any failure to comply with these laws could subject us to significant liabilities, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operation. We are subject to environmental regulations and any failure to comply with applicable laws could subject us to significant liabilities and harm our business. We are subject to a variety of local, state, federal, and foreign government regulations relating to the storage, discharge, handling, emission, generation, manufacture, and disposal of toxic or other hazardous substances used in the manufacture of our products. Any failure by us to control the use, disposal, removal, or storage of hazardous chemicals or toxic substances could subject us to significant liabilities, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Risks Related to Our Business and Industry We actively explore acquisitions as a part of our future growth strategy, which exposes us to a variety of risks that could adversely affect our business operations. Our business and future growth strategy includes as an important comp1nt the acquisition of businesses, technologies, services, or products that we believe are a strategic fit with or otherwise provide value to our business. We may fund these acquisitions by utilizing our cash, incurring debt, issuing additional shares of our common stock, or by other means. Completed acquisitions may expose us to a number of risks and expenses, including unanticipated liabilities, amortization expenses related to intangible assets with definite lives, or risks associated with entering new markets with which we have limited experience or where commercial alliances with experienced partners or existing sales channels are not available. Whether or not completed, acquisitions may result in diversion of management resources otherwise available for ongoing development of our business and significant expenditures. 21 We may not be able to realize the expected benefits of any completed acquisitions, including growth synergies and cost savings from the integration of acquired businesses or assets with our existing operations and technologies, as rapidly as expected, or at all. In addition, the integration and reorganization processes for our acquisitions may be complex, costly, and time consuming and include unanticipated issues, expenses, and liabilities. We may have difficulty in developing, manufacturing, and marketing the products of a newly acquired company in a manner that enhances the performance of our combined businesses or product lines and allows us to realize value from expected synergies. Moreover, we may lose key clients or employees of acquired businesses as a result of the change in ownership to us. Following an acquisition, we may not achieve the revenue or net income levels that justify the acquisition. Acquisitions may also result in 1 time charges, such as write offs or restructuring charges, impairment of goodwill or acquired In Process Research and Development, which could adversely affect our operating results. The failure to achieve the expected benefits of any acquisition may harm our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Attractive acquisition opportunities may not be available to us. We routinely consider the acquisition of other businesses. However, we may not locate suitable acquisition targets or have the opportunity to make acquisitions of such targets on favorable terms, which could negatively impact the growth of our business. In order to pursue such opportunities, we may require significant additional financing, which may not be available to us on favorable terms, if at all. Our current or potential competitors, many of which have significantly greater resources than we do, may compete with us to acquire compatible businesses, which would increase the acquisition prices and could cause us to expend significant time and funds on acquisitions we are unable to complete. The acquisitions we have made or may make in the future may make us the subject of lawsuits from either an acquired company stockholders, an acquired company previous stockholders, or our current stockholders. We may be the subject of lawsuits from either an acquired company stockholders, an acquired company previous stockholders, or our current stockholders. These lawsuits could result from the actions of the acquisition target prior to the date of the acquisition, from the acquisition transaction itself, or from actions after the acquisition. Defending potential lawsuits could cost us significant expense and distract management attention from the operation of the business. Additionally, these lawsuits could result in the cancellation of, or the inability to renew, certain insurance coverage that would be necessary to protect our assets. Customer and employee uncertainty about the effects of any acquisitions could harm us. Customers of any companies we acquire may, in response to the consummation of the acquisitions, delay or defer purchasing decisions, which could adversely affect the success of our acquired businesses. Similarly, employees of acquired companies may experience uncertainty about their future roles, which may adversely affect our ability to attract and retain key management, sales, marketing, and technical personnel following an acquisition. We may seek additional financing in the future, which could be difficult to obtain and which could dilute your ownership interest or the value of your shares. Our future capital requirements and the adequacy of available funds will depend, however, on numerous factors, including Market acceptance of our existing and future products; The success and sales of our products under various distributor agreements and other appropriate commercial strategies, including the ability of our partners to achieve third party reimbursement for our products; 22 The successful commercialization of products in development through appropriate commercial models and marketing channels; Progress in our product development efforts; The magnitude and scope of such product development efforts; Any potential acquisitions of products, technologies, or businesses; Progress with preclinical studies, clinical trials, and product approvals and clearances by the FDA and other agencies; The cost and timing of our efforts to manage our manufacturing capabilities and related costs; The cost of filing, prosecuting, defending, and enforcing patent claims and other intellectual property rights and the cost of defending any other legal proceeding; Competing technological and market developments; The development of strategic alliances for the marketing of certain of our products; The terms of such strategic alliances, including provisions (and our ability to satisfy such provisions) that provide upfront and or milest1 payments to us; and The cost of maintaining adequate inventory levels to meet current and future product demand. To the extent funds generated from our operations, together with our existing capital resources, are insufficient to meet future requirements, we will be required to obtain additional funds through equity or debt financings, through strategic alliances with corporate partners and others, or through other sources. The terms of any future equity financings may be dilutive to our investors and the terms of any debt financings may contain restrictive covenants, which limit our ability to pursue certain courses of action. Our ability to obtain financing is dependent on the status of our future business prospects as well as conditions prevailing in the relevant capital markets at the time we seek financing. No assurance can be given that any additional financing will be made available to us or will be available on acceptable terms should such a need arise. Our manufacturing processes involve inherent risks, and disruption could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition, and results of operations. The operation of biomedical manufacturing plants involves many risks, including the risks of breakdown, failure, or substandard performance of equipment, the occurrence of natural and other disasters, and the need to comply with the requirements of directives of government agencies, including the FDA. In addition, we rely on a small number of suppliers for certain key raw materials and a small number of suppliers for a number of other materials required for the manufacturing and delivery of our HA products. Although we believe that alternative sources for many of these and other comp1nts and raw materials that we use in our manufacturing processes are available, we cannot be certain that the supply of key raw materials, specifically HA, will continue be available at current levels or will be sufficient to meet our future needs. Any supply interruption could harm our ability to manufacture our products until a new source of supply is identified and qualified. We may not be able to find sufficient alternative suppliers in a reasonable time period, or on commercially reasonable terms, if at all, and our ability to produce and supply our products could be impaired. We use raw materials derived from animal sources to produce certain of our products, and there is no guarantee that we will be able to continue to utilize this source of material in the future. Our manufacturing processes and research and development efforts for some of our ophthalmic and veterinary products involve products derived from animals. We procure our animal derived raw materials from a qualified vendor, who controls for contamination and has processes that effectively inactivate infectious agents; however, we cannot assure you that we can completely eliminate the risk of transmission of infectious agents. Furthermore, regulatory authorities could in the future impose restrictions on the use of animal derived raw materials that could impact our business. 23 The utilization of animals in research and development and product commercialization is subject to increasing focus by animal rights activists. The activities of animal rights groups and other organizations that have protested animal based research and development programs or boycotted the products resulting from such programs could cause an interruption in our manufacturing processes and research and development efforts. The occurrence of material operational problems, including but not limited to the events described above, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations during the period of such operational difficulties and beyond. We lease properties in the United States and Italy, and there is no guarantee that these leaseholds will be without issue or sufficient to support future growth. We lease approximately 134,000 square feet of administrative, research and development, and manufacturing space in Bedford, MA and approximately 33,000 square feet of office, research and development, training, and warehousing space in Padova, Italy. The current term of the Bedford lease extends to 2022, and the current term of the Padova lease extends to 2032, each with several options for renewal. Please see Item 2 Properties for additional information on our current leases. The nature of these leaseholds presents certain risks. We must maintain a positive working relationship with the respective owners as a dispute with either owner over payment, maintenance, or any other matter could be disruptive to our business. Additionally, there is a possibility that changes to our business or the geographic location of the facilities could make either location less suitable to our operations. Any renegotiation or termination of either lease could result in substantial cost or business interruption to our operations. Additionally, there is no guarantee that our current space will be sufficient to support our future growth or that any future relocation or expansion of our operations would be completed smoothly or in a timely manner due to, among other things, unexpected construction delays or unexpected difficulties related to the achievement of necessary permitting. Any business disruption as a result of any of these factors could have a material impact on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. We may face circumstances in the future that will result in impairment charges, including, but not limited to, goodwill impairment and In Process Research and Development ( IPR&D ) charges. As of December 31, 2018, we had long lived assets, including goodwill and IPR&D, of $76.1 million. If the fair value of any of our long lived assets decreases as a result of an economic slowdown, a downturn in the markets where we sell products and services, or a downturn in our financial performance or future outlook, we may be required to record an impairment charge on such assets. We are required to test intangible assets with indefinite life periods for potential impairment annually and on an interim basis if there are indicators of a potential impairment. We also are required to evaluate amortizable intangible assets and fixed assets for impairment if there are indicators of a possible impairment. Impairment charges could have a negative impact on our results of operations and financial position, as well as on the market price of our common stock. We could become subject to product liability claims, which, if successful, could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition, and results of operations. The testing, marketing, and sale of human health care products entail an inherent risk of allegations of product liability, and there can be no assurance that substantial product liability claims will not be asserted against us. Although we have not received any material product liability claims to date and have an insurance policy of $5.0 million per occurrence and $5.0 million in the aggregate to cover such product liability claims should they arise, there can be no assurance that material claims will not arise in the future or that our insurance will be adequate to cover all situations. Moreover, there can be no assurance that such insurance, or additional insurance, if required, will be available in the future or, if available, will be available on commercially reasonable terms. Any product liability claim, if successful, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. 24 Our business is dependent upon hiring and retaining qualified management and technical personnel. We are highly dependent on the members of our management and technical staff, the loss of 1 or more of whom could have a material adverse effect on us. We have experienced a number of management changes in recent years, and there can be no assurances that any future management changes will not adversely affect our business. We believe that our future success will depend in large part upon our ability to attract and retain technical and highly skilled executive, managerial, professional, and technical personnel. We face significant competition for such personnel from competitive companies, research and academic institutions, government entities, and other organizations. There can be no assurance that we will be successful in hiring or retaining the personnel we require. The failure to hire and retain such personnel could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Currency exchange rate fluctuations may have a negative impact on our reported earnings. Approximately 5% of our business during 2018 was conducted in functional currencies other than the U.S. dollar, which is our reporting currency. Thus, currency fluctuations among the U.S. dollar and the other currencies in which we do business have caused and will continue to cause foreign currency transaction gains and losses. Currently, we attempt to manage foreign currency risk through the matching of assets and liabilities. In the future, we may undertake to manage foreign currency risk through additional hedging methods. We recognize foreign currency gains or losses arising from our operations in the period incurred. We cannot guarantee that we will be successful in managing foreign currency risk or in predicting the effects of exchange rate fluctuations upon our future operating results because of the variability of currency exposure and the potential volatility of currency exchange rates. Information security breaches or business system disruptions may adversely affect our business. We rely on our information technology infrastructure and management information systems to effectively run our business. While we have not previously experienced a material information security breach caused by illegal hacking, computer viruses, or acts of vandalism or terrorism, we may in the future be subject to such a breach. Our security measures or those of our third party service providers may not detect or prevent such breaches. Any such compromise to our information security could result in an interruption in our operations, the unauthorized publication of our confidential business or proprietary information, the unauthorized release of customer, vendor, or employee data, the violation of privacy, including under the GDPR recently promulgated in the European Union, or other laws and exposure to litigation, any of which could harm our business and operating results. Risks Related to Our Intellectual Property We may be unable to adequately protect our intellectual property rights, which could have a material impact on our business and future financial results. Our efforts to enforce our intellectual property rights may not be successful. We rely on a combination of copyright, trademark, patent, and trade secret laws, confidentiality procedures, and contractual provisions to protect our proprietary rights. Our success will depend, in part, on our ability to obtain and enforce patents and trademarks, to protect trade secrets, to obtain licenses to technology owned by third parties when necessary, and to conduct our business without infringing on the proprietary rights of others. The patent positions of pharmaceutical, medical product, and biotechnology firms, including ours, can be uncertain and involve complex legal and factual questions. There can be no assurance that any patent applications will result in the issuance of patents or, if any patents are issued, that they will provide significant proprietary protection or commercial advantage or will not be circumvented by others. Filing and prosecution of patent applications, litigation to establish the validity and scope of patents, assertion of patent infringement claims against others, and the defense of patent infringement claims by others can be expensive and time consuming. There can be no assurance that, in the event that any claims with respect to any of our patents, if issued, are challenged by 1 or more third parties, any court or patent authority ruling on such challenge will determine that such patent claims are valid and enforceable. An adverse outcome in such litigation or patent review process could cause us to lose exclusivity covered by the disputed rights. If a third party is found to have rights covering products or processes used by us, we could be forced to cease using the technologies or marketing the products covered by such rights, we could be subject to significant liabilities to such third party, and we could be required to license technologies from such third party in order to continue production of the products. Furthermore, even if our patents are determined to be valid, enforceable, and broad in scope, there can be no assurance that competitors will not be able to design around such patents and compete with us using the resulting alternative technology. We have a policy of seeking patent protection for patentable aspects of our proprietary technology. We intend to seek patent protection with respect to products and processes developed in the course of our activities when we believe such protection is in our best interest and when the cost of seeking such protection is not inordinate. However, no assurance can be given that any patent application will be filed, that any filed applications will result in issued patents, or that any issued patents will provide us with a competitive advantage or will not be successfully challenged by third parties. The protections afforded by patents will depend upon their scope and validity, and others may be able to design around our patents. 25 We also rely upon trade secrets and proprietary know how for certain non patented aspects of our technology. To protect such information, we require all employees, consultants, and licensees to enter into confidentiality agreements limiting the disclosure and use of such information. There can be no assurance that these agreements provide meaningful protection or that they will not be breached, that we would have adequate remedies for any such breach, or that our trade secrets, proprietary know how, and our technological advances will not otherwise become known to others. In addition, there can be no assurance that, despite precautions taken by us, others have not and will not obtain access to our proprietary technology. Further, there can be no assurance that third parties will not independently develop substantially equivalent or better technology. There can be no assurance that we will not infringe upon the intellectual property rights of others, which could have a significant impact on our business and financial results. Other entities have filed patent applications for, or have been issued patents concerning, various aspects of HA related products or processes, including in the segments in which we do business. There can be no assurance that the products or processes developed by us will not infringe on the patent rights of others in the future. The cost of defending infringement suits is typically large, and there is no guarantee that any future defense would be successful. In addition, infringement could lead to substantial damages payouts or our inability to produce or market certain of our current or future products. As a result, any such infringement may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Risks Related to Ownership of Our Common Stock Our stock price may be highly volatile, and we cannot assure you that market making in our common stock will continue. The market price of shares of our common stock may be highly volatile. Factors such as announcements of new commercial products or technological innovations by us or our competitors, disclosure of results of clinical testing or regulatory proceedings, government regulation and approvals, developments in patent or other proprietary rights, public concern as to the safety of products developed by us, and general market conditions may have a significant effect on the market price of our common stock. The trading price of our common stock could be subject to wide fluctuations in response to quarter to quarter variations in our operating results, material announcements by us or our competitors, governmental regulatory action, conditions in the health care industry generally or in the medical products industry specifically, or other events or factors, many of which are beyond our control. In addition, the stock market has experienced extreme price and volume fluctuations, which have particularly affected the market prices of many medical products companies and which often have been unrelated to the operating performance of such companies. Our operating results in future quarters may be below the expectations of equity research analysts and investors. In such an event, the price of our common stock would likely decline, perhaps substantially. If securities or industry analysts do not publish or cease publishing research or reports about us, our business, or our market, or if they adversely change their recommendations regarding our stock, our stock price and trading volume could decline. The trading market for our common stock is influenced by the research and reports that securities or industry analysts may publish about us, our business, our market, or our competitors. No person is under any obligation to publish research or reports on us, and any person publishing research or reports on us may discontinue doing so at any time without notice. If adequate research coverage is not maintained on our company or if any of the analysts who cover us downgrade our stock or publish inaccurate or unfavorable research about our business or provide relatively more favorable recommendations about our competitors, our stock price would likely decline. If any analysts who cover us were to cease coverage of our company or fail to regularly publish reports on us, we could lose visibility in the financial markets, which in turn could cause our stock price or trading volume to decline. 26 We currently do not intend to pay dividends on our common stock in the foreseeable future. We have never declared or paid any cash dividends on our common stock. We currently intend to retain earnings, if any, for use in our business and do not anticipate paying cash dividends on our common stock in the foreseeable future. Accordingly, investors are not likely to receive any dividends on their common stock in the foreseeable future, and their ability to achieve a return on their investment will therefore depend on appreciation in the price of our common stock. Our charter documents contain anti takeover provisions that may prevent or delay an acquisition of our company. Our charter documents continue to contain anti takeover provisions that could prevent or delay an acquisition of our company. The provisions include, among others, a classified board of directors, advance notice to the board of stockholder proposals, limitations on the ability of stockholders to remove directors and to call stockholder meetings, and a provision that allows vacancies on the Board of Directors to be filled by vote of a majority of the remaining directors. We are also subject to Section 203 of the Delaware General Corporate Law which, subject to certain exceptions, prohibits a Delaware corporation from engaging in any of a broad range of business combinations with any interested stockholder for a period of 3 years following the date that such stockholder becomes an interested stockholder. Those provisions could have the effect of discouraging a third party from pursuing a non negotiated takeover of our company at a price considered attractive by many stockholders and could have the effect of preventing or delaying a potential acquirer from acquiring control of our company. ITEM 2 PROPERTIES Our corporate headquarters is located in Bedford, Massachusetts, where we lease approximately 134,000 square feet of administrative, research and development, and manufacturing space. We entered into this lease in January 2007, and the lease commenced in May 2007 for an initial term of ten and a half years. In October 2016, we exercised the first option under the lease to extend its term for five years. There are 2 additional renewal periods, each of which is subject to the condition that we notify the landlord of our exercise of such option at least 1 year prior to the expiration of the then current term. 2 additional renewal options each extend the term an additional five years, and the final renewal option extends the term an additional six years. In October 2015, Anika S.r.l. entered into a build to suit lease agreement for a new European headquarters facility consisting of approximately 33,000 square feet of general office, research and development, training, and warehousing space located in Padova, Italy. This lease, which has an initial term of fifteen years, commenced in February 2017 in accordance with the lease agreement, as amended in February 2017. The lease will automatically renew for up to 3 additional six year terms, subject to certain terms and conditions. Anika S.r.l. may elect to early withdraw from this lease subject to certain financial penalties after six years and with no penalties after the ninth year. The lease provides for an initial yearly rent of approximately $0.3 million. Prior to April 2017, Anika S.r.l. leased approximately 28,000 square feet of laboratory, warehouse, and office space in Abano Terme, Italy from Fidia. The lease commenced in December 2009. In December 2016, following discussions between Anika S.r.l. and Fidia, Anika S.r.l. notified Fidia of its intention to terminate this lease agreement as of March 2017, in accordance with the terms of the lease. In 2018, we had aggregate facility lease expenses of approximately $18 million. We believe that the capacity of our Bedford, Massachusetts corporate headquarters is sufficient to satisfy our needs for the immediately foreseeable future. We also believe that Anika S.r.l. leased facility in Padova, Italy will be sufficient to satisfy its needs for the foreseeable future. 27 ITEM 3 LEGAL PROCEEDINGS We are involved from time to time in various legal proceedings arising in the normal course of business. Although the outcomes of these legal proceedings are inherently difficult to predict, we do not expect the resolution of these proceedings to have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations, or cash flow. I ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES Common Stock Information Our common stock has traded on the NASDAQ Global Select Market since November 25, 1997, under the symbol ANIK. At December 31, 2018, the closing price per share of our common stock was $3361 as reported on the NASDAQ Global Select Market, and there were 121 holders of record. We believe that the number of beneficial owners of our common stock at that date was substantially greater, due to shares being held by intermediaries. We have never declared or paid any cash dividends on our common stock. We currently intend to retain earnings, if any, for use in our business and do not anticipate paying cash dividends on our common stock in the foreseeable future. Payment of future dividends, if any, on our common stock will be at the discretion of our Board of Directors after taking into account various factors, including our financial condition, operating results, anticipated cash needs, and plans for expansion. 28 Performance Graph Set forth below is a graph comparing the total returns of our company, the NASDAQ Composite Index, and the NASDAQ Biotechnology Index. The graph assumes $100 is invested on December 31, 2013 in our common stock and each of the indices. Past performance is not indicative of future results. Dec 13 Dec 14 Dec 15 Dec 16 Dec 17 Dec 18 Anika Therapeutics, Inc. $ 100.00 $ 106.76 $ 100.00 $ 128.30 $ 14127 $ 88.08 NASDAQ Composite Index $ 100.00 $ 11340 $ 119.89 $ 128.89 $ 165.29 $ 158.87 NASDAQ Biotechnology Index $ 100.00 $ 134.10 $ 149.42 $ 117.02 $ 14166 $ 128.45 Securities Authorized for Issuance Under Equity Compensation Plans For information regarding securities authorized for issuance under our employee stock based compensation plans, see II, Item 12, Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters, included elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. ITEM 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA The following selected consolidated financial data should be read in conjunction with the Consolidated Financial Statements and the Notes thereto and the section capti1d Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations included elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. The Balance Sheet Data at December 31, 2018 and 2017 and the Statement of Operations Data for each of the 3 years ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 have been derived from the audited Consolidated Financial Statements for such years, included elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. The Balance Sheet Data at December 31, 2016, 2015, and 2014, and the Statement of Operations Data for each of the 2 years in the period ended December 31, 2015 and 2014 have been derived from audited consolidated financial statements for such years not included in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. 29 Years ended December 31, 2018 2017 2016 2015 2014 Statements of Operations Data (in thousands, except per share data) Product revenue $ 105,531 $ 107,783 $ 102,932 $ 87,696 $ 75,474 Licensing, milest1 and contract revenue 24 5,637 447 5,303 30,121 Total revenue 105,555 113,420 103,379 92,999 105,595 Cost of product revenue 31,280 27,364 24,027 21,053 20,930 Product gross profit 74,251 80,419 78,905 66,643 54,544 Product gross margin 70 % 75 % 77 % 76 % 72 % Total operating expenses 83,806 67,691 52,772 44,865 44,148 Net income 18,722 31,816 32,547 30,758 38,319 Diluted net income per common share $ 127 $ 211 $ 215 $ 201 $ 251 Diluted common shares outstanding 14,689 15,068 15,116 15,321 15,269 Years ended December 31, 2018 2017 2016 2015 2014 Balance Sheet Data (in thousands) Cash, cash equivalents and investments $ 159,014 $ 157,256 $ 124,761 $ 138,458 $ 106,906 Working capital 191,654 193,254 161,641 159,155 131,863 Total assets 278,993 282,617 240,246 235,748 192,808 Long term liabilities 4,092 6,054 8,674 7,622 8,737 Retained earnings 218,233 199,511 168,209 135,662 104,904 Stockholders' equity 263,612 263,491 222,773 210,848 178,098 In 2015, the Company adopted new accounting guidance related to the presentation of deferred income taxes, which has been applied above retrospectively. Current deferred tax assets and liabilities have been reclassified as non current deferred tax assets and liabilities. The Company adopted the guidance in the FASB Accounting Standards Codification ( ASC ) Revenue from Contracts with Customers (ASC 606) using the modified retrospective method effective January 1, 2018. Revenues for all periods prior to January 1, 2018 were recognized under ASC 605, Revenue Recognition . The following section contains statements that are not statements of historical fact and are forward looking statements within the meaning of the federal securities laws. These statements involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties, and other factors that may cause our actual results, performance, or achievement to differ materially from anticipated results, performance, or achievement, expressed or implied in such forward looking statements. These statements reflect our current views with respect to future events, are based on assumptions, and are subject to risks and uncertainties. We discuss many of these risks and uncertainties at the beginning of this Annual Report on Form 10 K and under the sections capti1d Business and Risk Factors. The following discussion should also be read in conjunction with the consolidated financial statements and the Notes thereto appearing elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS Management Overview We are a global, integrated orthopedic and regenerative medicines company committed to improving the lives of patients with degenerative orthopedic diseases and traumatic conditions with clinically meaningful therapies along the continuum of care, from palliative pain management to regenerative tissue repair. We have over 2 decades of global expertise developing, manufacturing, and commercializing our products based on our proprietary hyaluronic acid ( HA ) technology. Our orthopedic medicine portfolio includes ORTHOVISC, MONOVISC, and CINGAL, which alleviate pain and restore joint function by replenishing depleted HA, and HYALOFAST, a solid HA based scaffold to aid cartilage repair and regeneration. Our therapeutic offerings consist of products in the following areas Orthobiologics, Dermal, Surgical, and Other, which includes our ophthalmic and veterinary products. All of our products are based on HA, a naturally occurring, biocompatible polymer found throughout the body. Due to its unique biophysical and biochemical properties, HA plays an important role in a number of physiological functions such as the protection and lubrication of soft tissues and joints, the maintenance of the structural integrity of tissues, and the transport of molecules to and within cells. 30 Our proprietary technologies for modifying the HA molecule allow product properties to be tailored specifically to therapeutic use. Our patented technology chemically modifies HA to allow for longer residence time in the body. We also offer products made from HA based on 2 other technologies HYAFF, which is a solid form of HA, and ACP gel, an autocross linked polymer of HA. Our technologies are protected by an extensive portfolio of owned and licensed patents. Since our inception in 1992, we have utilized a commercial partnership model for the distribution of our products to end users. Our strong, worldwide ne2rk of distributors has historically provided, and continues to provide, a solid foundation for our revenue growth and territorial expansion. For near term and long term opportunities in the U.S. market, we have evaluated a potential hybrid commercial approach that would see us balance a small direct model with an optimal form of strategic partnership, an approach we intend to utilize for the commercialization of our injectable, HA based surgical b1 repair product. For longer term future products in the U.S. market, we intend to evaluate the appropriate commercial model for each instance on a case by case basis, based on market dynamics and other factors. These models could include direct sales, distribution partnerships, or a hybrid of those forms. We believe that the combination of the direct and distribution commercial models will maximize the revenue potential from our current and future product portfolio. On May 2, 2018, we publicly disclosed a voluntary recall of certain production lots of our HYAFF based products, HYALOFAST, HYALOGRAFT C, and HYALOMATRIX. We communicated with all affected distributors in advance of that announcement, and we have taken all required or otherwise appropriate actions with respect to applicable regulatory bodies. We initiated the voluntary recall following internal quality testing, which indicated that the products were at risk of not maintaining certain measures throughout their entire shelf life. While there was no indication of any safety or efficacy issue related to the products, we are committed to the highest standards of quality and removed the products from the field as a precautionary measure. During the first quarter of 2018, we recorded a revenue reserve of $11 million, $0.9 million of which related to revenue recorded in prior periods, and adjustments during the balance of the year were immaterial. We also recorded an inventory charge for fiscal year 2018 of $0.8 million for the related non saleable inventory, and we incurred $0.3 million of expenses associated with the administration and remediation of the voluntary recall. During the fourth quarter of 2018, we resolved this matter and resumed shipment of these products, and all of the affected products had been returned with no material change to the related reserves as of December 31, 2018. As a result of this voluntary recall, revenue generated from the affected products during fiscal year 2018 declined between $1 million and $2 million as compared to fiscal year 2017. The following sections provide more information about our products Orthobiologics Our orthobiologics business contributed 89% of our product revenue for the year ended December 31, 2018. Our orthobiologics products primarily consist of viscosupplement and regenerative orthopedic products. Our viscosupplement products include ORTHOVISC, ORTHOVISC mini, and MONOVISC, each of which is commercialized in various territories worldwide, and CINGAL, our next generation viscosupplement launched internationally in Canada and the European Union in the second quarter of 2016 after receiving Health Canada and CE Mark approval. ORTHOVISC, our original viscosupplement product, is a 3 injection osteoarthritis treatment marketed by us in the United States since 2004 and internationally since 1996 through various distribution agreements. MONOVISC, our second generation viscosupplement, is a single injection osteoarthritis treatment marketed in the United States since 2014 and internationally since 2008. ORTHOVISC mini is available in Europe and is designed for the treatment of osteoarthritis in small joints. We are currently seeking regulatory approval for CINGAL, our third generation, single injection osteoarthritis product, in the United States. We currently offer several orthopedic products used in connection with regenerative medicine. The products currently available in Europe and certain international markets include HYALOFAST, a biodegradable support for human b1 marrow mesenchymal stem cells used for cartilage regeneration and as an adjunct for microfracture surgery; HYAL1CT, a resorbable knitted fabric mesh for use in orthopedic and trauma reconstructive procedures to maintain the relative position of engrafted b1 tissue or b1 fragments from comminuted fractures; and HYALOSS, HYAFF fibers used to mix blood b1 grafts to form a paste for b1 regeneration. We also offer HYALOGLIDE, an ACP gel used in tenolysis treatment that, with additional clinical data, may demonstrate potential for flexor tendon adhesion prevention and for the treatment of adhesive capsulitis prevention in the shoulder. This product is commercialized through a ne2rk of distributors, primarily in Europe and the Middle East. We believe that the U.S. market offers excellent expansion potential to increase revenue for these products, and this will continue to be a focus area for us moving forward. 31 In addition to the products discussed above, we received CE Mark approval in December 2016 for a product which utilizes our proprietary HA technology to treat pain associated with lateral epicondylitis, better known as tennis elbow. Outside of the United States, this product is marketed under the trade name ORTHOVISC T. Additionally, in the second quarter of 2016, we submitted an IDE to the FDA to conduct a Phase III clinical trial for this treatment, and the IDE was approved by the FDA in June 2016. We also received 510(k) clearance for an injectable, HA based surgical b1 repair product in December 2017, which we intend to launch in the U.S. during 2019 utilizing the previously described hybrid commercialization approach. Our strategy is to continue to add new products, to expand the indications for use of both our current and any new products, and to expand our commercial reach. The orthobiologics area has been our fastest growing area, generating 67% growth from 2013 to 2018. We continue to seek new distribution partnerships around the world, in concert with entering new markets with other appropriate sales strategies, and we expect total orthobiologics product sales to decrease modestly in 2019 compared to 2018 based mainly on pricing declines in the U.S. market partially offset by increased sales of MONOVISC and CINGAL internationally. Dermal Our dermal products contributed less than 1% to our product revenue for the year ended December 31, 2018 mainly due to the previously described voluntary recall of certain production lots of our HYAFF based products. Our dermal franchise consists of advanced wound care products, which are based on the HYAFF technology, and an aesthetic dermal filler. We offer products for the treatment of skin wounds ranging from burns to diabetic ulcers. The products cover a variety of wound treatment solutions including debridement agents, advanced therapies, and scaffolds used as skin substitutes. Leading products include HYALOMATRIX and HYALOFILL for the treatment of complex wounds, such as burns and ulcers, and for use in connection with the regeneration of skin. Our dermal products are commercialized through a ne2rk of distributors, primarily in the United States, Europe, Latin America, and the Middle East. Products cleared for sale in the United States include HYALOMATRIX, HYALOFILL, HYALOGRAN, HYALOSAFE, and HYALOMATRIX 3D. We have a commercial partnership agreement with Medline Industries, Inc. to commercialize HYALOMATRIX in the United States on an exclusive basis through 2022 Our aesthetic dermatology product is a dermal filler based on our proprietary, chemically modified, cross linked HA, and it is primarily commercialized in certain countries in the Middle East. Internationally, this product is marketed under the ELEVESS trade name. In the United States, the trade name is HYDRELLE, although the product is not currently marketed in the United States. Surgical Our surgical group consists of products used to prevent surgical adhesions and to treat ENT disorders. For the year ended December 31, 2018, sales of surgical products contributed 5% of our product revenue. Included in our surgical franchise is HYALOBARRIER, a clinically proven post operative adhesion barrier for use in the abdomino pelvic area. The product is currently commercialized in Europe, the Middle East, and certain African and Asian countries through a distribution ne2rk, but it is not approved in the United States. We also offer several products used in connection with the treatment of ENT disorders. The lead products are MEROGEL, a woven fleece nasal packing, and MEROGEL INJECTABLE, a thick, viscous hydrogel composed of cross linked HA, a biocompatible agent that creates a moist wound healing environment. We partner with Medtronic for the worldwide distribution of these products. 32 Other Our other products include our ophthalmic and veterinary products, which constituted 6% of our product revenue for the year ended December 31, 2018. These legacy products are not a part of our core business. Our ophthalmic business includes HA viscoelastic products used in ophthalmic surgery. Sales of ophthalmic products contributed 2% of our product revenue and sales of HYVISC, our veterinary product used for the treatment of equine osteoarthritis, contributed 4% of our product revenue for the year ended December 31, 2018. Research and Development Our research and development efforts primarily consist of the development of new medical applications for our HA based technology, the management of clinical trials for certain product candidates, the preparation and processing of applications for regulatory approvals or clearances at all relevant stages of product development, and process development and scale up manufacturing activities for our existing and new products. Our development focus is orthopedic and regenerative medicine and includes products for tissue protection, repair, and regeneration. We anticipate that we will continue to commit significant resources in the near future to research and development activities, including in relation to preclinical activities and clinical trials. These activities are aimed at the delivery of a steady cascade of new product development and launches over the next several years. Our research and development efforts primarily consist of the development of new medical applications for our HA based technology, the management of clinical trials for certain product candidates, the preparation and processing of applications for regulatory approvals or clearances at all relevant stages of product development, and process development and scale up manufacturing activities for our existing and new products. Our development focus is orthopedic and regenerative medicines and includes products for tissue protection, repair, and regeneration. For the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, these expenses were $18.2 million, $18.8 million, and $10.7 million, respectively. We anticipate that we will continue to commit significant resources to, and increase our aggregate spending on, research and development activities, including in relation to preclinical activities and clinical trials, in the future. Our third generation, single injection osteoarthritis product under development in the United States, CINGAL, which is composed of our proprietary cross linked HA material combined with an approved steroid and is designed to provide both short and long term pain relief to patients, is our lead pipeline product and a critical comp1nt of our growth strategy. We completed an initial CINGAL Phase III clinical trial, including the associated statistical analysis for 368 enrolled patients, during the fourth quarter of 2014 with data indicating that the product met all primary and secondary endpoints relative to placebo set forth for the trial. During the first half of 2015, we completed a CINGAL retreatment study with 242 patients who had participated in the Phase III clinical trial and reported safety data related to the retreatment study. This initial Phase III clinical trial and the associated retreatment study supported the Health Canada and CE Mark approval of the product, and the commercial launch of the product in both Canada and the European Union occurred in the second quarter of 2016. In the United States, after discussions with the FDA related to the regulatory pathway for CINGAL, we conducted a formal meeting with the FDA OCP to present and discuss our data in September 2015, and we submitted a formal request for designation with OCP a month later. In its response to our formal request for designation, OCP assigned the product to the FDA CDER as the lead agency center for premarket review and regulation. We then held discussions with CDER to understand the requirements for submitting an NDA for CINGAL. We held a meeting with CDER in September 2016 to align on an approval framework and on submission requirements for this NDA for CINGAL, including the execution of an additional Phase III clinical trial to supplement our existing CINGAL pivotal study data. We submitted an IND in late 2016, and discussions with CDER indicated that they did not have objections to our clinical protocol design. As a result, we commenced work on this second Phase III clinical trial ( CINGAL 16 02 Study ) in the first quarter of 2017, and the first patient was treated in the second quarter of 2017. Enrollment of the 576 patients in this second Phase III clinical trial was completed during October 2017, and we completed the six month patient follow up in April 2018. We received and analyzed the data from the CINGAL 16 02 Study during the second quarter of 2018, and, while substantial pain reduction associated with CINGAL was evident at each measurement point, we determined based on statistical analysis that it did not meet the primary study endpoint of demonstrating a statistically significant difference in pain reduction between CINGAL and the approved steroid comp1nt of CINGAL at the six month time point. In the third quarter of 2017, we initiated an additional 3 month extended follow up study in conjunction with the CINGAL 16 02 Study to investigate the efficacy of CINGAL over this longer period. The first patients were enrolled in this follow up study in the fourth quarter of 2017 and we completed the nine month patient follow up in the third quarter of 2018. Given the totality of the results from our studies related to CINGAL, we have evaluated multiple strategies to optimize the potential U.S. regulatory pathway for the product. We recently met with FDA to discuss this potential approval pathway for CINGAL in the United States moving forward. In the meeting, FDA indicated that an additional Phase III clinical trial would be necessary to support U.S. marketing approval for CINGAL, and we are continuing to align with FDA on the parameters and requirements for this additional clinical trial, which we expect to commence once alignment is achieved. 33 We have several research and development programs underway for new products, including for HYALOFAST (in the United States), an innovative product for cartilage tissue repair, and other early stage regenerative medicine development programs. HYALOFAST, which received CE Mark approval in September 2009, is commercially available in Europe and certain international countries. During the first quarter of 2015, we submitted an Investigational Device Exemption ( IDE ) for HYALOFAST to the FDA, which was approved in July 2015. We commenced patient enrollment in a clinical trial in December 2015, and we are advancing site initiations and patient enrollment activities. In the second quarter of 2016, a supplement to the HYALOFAST IDE was approved to expand the inclusion criteria for the clinical study, which was aimed at decreasing the time needed to complete the clinical trial. The previously described voluntary recall of certain production lots of our HYAFF based products did not impact the HYALOFAST clinical trial, as the product used in the clinical trial is not sourced from the affected production lots. Given the changing medical landscape with respect to the randomization arm for this trial, the microfracture procedure, we are actively pursuing alternative strategies to accelerate patient enrollment. In the third quarter of 2017, we submitted an application to the FDA for 510(k) clearance of an injectable, HA based surgical b1 repair product that is reabsorbed by the body and replaced by the growth of new b1 during the healing process. The 510(k) clearance was received from the FDA in December 2017, and we expect to make this b1 repair product commercially available in the United States during 2019 utilizing the previously described hybrid commercial approach. In addition to other early stage research and development initiatives we are currently undertaking, we are working to expand our regenerative medicine pipeline with a new product candidate in the form of an implant for rotator cuff repair utilizing our proprietary solid HA, which could be used to repair partial and full thickness rotator cuff tears. We finalized development of an initial product prototype during the fourth quarter of 2018, and we are performing important preclinical testing of and developing the surgical instrumentation for the potential product. We are also currently proceeding with other research and development programs, 1 of which utilizes our proprietary HA technology to treat pain associated with common repetitive overuse injuries, such as lateral epicondylitis, also known as tennis elbow. We submitted a CE Mark application for this treatment during the first quarter of 2016 and received a CE Mark for the treatment of pain associated with tennis elbow in December 2016. We began work towards a post market clinical study in relation to the CE Mark for this product in the fourth quarter of 2018. Outside of the United States, this product is marketed under the trade name ORTHOVISC T. Additionally, in the second quarter of 2016, we submitted an IDE to the FDA to conduct a Phase III clinical trial for this treatment, which was approved by the FDA in June 2016. We also have several other research and development programs underway focused on expanding the indications of our current products, including MONOVISC. Notwithstanding those internal programs, the previously disclosed program conducted and funded by Mitek seeking to expand MONOVISC indication to include treatment of pain associated with osteoarthritis of the hip was cancelled in the fourth quarter of 2018 after the performance of an independent interim analysis required by the related clinical protocol. During 2019, we will also be performing post market clinical work in relation to the CE Mark for MONOVISC. In June 2015, we entered into an agreement with the Institute for Applied Life Sciences at the University of Massachusetts Amherst to collaborate on research to develop a therapy for rheumatoid arthritis. The purpose of this research was to develop a novel modality for the treatment of rheumatoid arthritis. The agreement with the University of Massachusetts Amherst was extended in January 2018, and it was terminated in October 2018 after discussions between the parties. In January 2018, we entered into an agreement with the University of Liverpool to develop an injectable mesenchymal stem cell therapy for the treatment of age related osteoarthritis with the goal of bringing a therapeutics candidate through clinical trials to market to meet an unmet therapeutic need. We are currently in the preclinical phase of this program and aim to finalize proof of concept during the second quarter of 2020. 34 Summary of Critical Accounting Policies; Significant Judgments and Estimates Our discussion and analysis of our financial condition and results of operations are based upon our consolidated financial statements included elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K, which consolidated financial statements have been prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States. The preparation of these consolidated financial statements requires us to make estimates and judgments that affect the reported amounts of assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses, and the related disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities. We monitor our estimates on an ongoing basis for changes in facts and circumstances, and material changes in these estimates could occur in the future. Changes in estimates are recorded in the period in which they become known. We base our estimates on historical experience and other assumptions that we believe to be reasonable under the circumstances. Actual results may differ from our estimates if past experience or other assumptions do not turn out to be substantially accurate. We have identified the policies below as critical to our business operations and the understanding of our results of operations. The impact and any associated risks related to these policies on our business operations are discussed throughout this section capti1d Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations where such policies affect our reported and expected financial results. For a detailed discussion on the application of these and other accounting policies, see Note 2 to the consolidated financial statements included elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. Revenue Recognition General We adopted the guidance in the ASC 606 using the modified retrospective method effective January 1, 2018. The adoption of ASC 606 was applied to all contracts not completed as of the date of adoption. The adoption did not have a material impact on the amount and timing of revenue recognized in the consolidated financial statements. We made no adjustments to our previously reported product and total revenue, as those periods continue to be presented in accordance with our historical accounting practices under Topic 605, Revenue Recognition . Pursuant to ASC 606, we recognize revenue when a customer obtains control of promised goods or services. The amount of revenue that is recorded reflects the consideration that we expect to receive in exchange for those goods or services. We apply the following five step model in order to determine this amount (i) identification of the promised goods or services in the contract; (ii) determination of whether the promised goods or services are performance obligations, including whether they are capable of being distinct or distinct in the context of the contract; (iii) measurement of the transaction price, including the constraint on variable consideration; (iv) allocation of the transaction price to the performance obligations; and (v) recognition of revenue when (or as) we satisfy each performance obligation. We have agreements with Mitek that include the grant of certain licenses, performance of development services, and the supply of product at Mitek option. Revenues from the agreements with Mitek represent 73% of total revenues for the year ended December 31, 2018. We completed the performance obligations related to granted licenses and development services under these agreements prior to 2016. We have no remaining material performance obligations under the Mitek agreements. We have agreements with other customers that may include the delivery of a license and supply of product. The upfront payments under such agreements upon the delivery of the license have not been material. Our typical supply agreements represent a promise to deliver product at the customer discretion that are considered options. We assess if these options provide a material right to the licensee and if so, they are accounted for as separate performance obligations. The majority of our supply agreements do not provide options that are considered material rights. Certain of our agreements include sales based royalties and milest1s. As we consider the license to be the predominant item to which the royalties relate for these agreements, sales based royalties and milest1s are only recognized when the later of the underlying sale occurs or the performance obligation to which some or all of the sales based royalty has been satisfied (or partially satisfied). This is generally in the same period that our licensees complete their product sales in their territory, for which we are contractually entitled to a percentage based royalty. Revenue from sales based royalties is included in product revenues. Product Revenue We sell our products principally to a number of distributors (i.e., our customers) under legally enforceable, executed contracts. Our distributors subsequently resell the products to sub distributors and health care providers, among others. We recognize revenue from product sales when the distributor obtains control of our product, which typically occurs upon shipment to the distributor, in return for agreed upon, fixed price consideration. Performance obligations are generally settled quickly after purchase order acceptance; therefore, the value of unsatisfied performance obligations at the end of any reporting period is generally immaterial. Our payment terms are consistent with prevailing practice in the respective markets in which we do business. Most of our distributors make payments based on fixed price contract terms, which are not affected by contingent events that could impact the transaction price. Payment terms fall within the 1 year guidance for the practical expedient, which allows us to forgo adjustment of the contractual payment amount of consideration for the effects of a significant financing comp1nt. Our contracts with customers do not customarily provide a right of return, unless certain product quality standards are not met. Some of our distributor agreements have volume based discounts with tiered pricing which are generally prospective in nature. These prospective discounts together with any free of charge sample units offered are evaluated as potential material rights. If the prospective discounts or free of charge sample units are considered material rights, these would be separate performance obligations and a portion of the sales transaction price is allocated to the material right. Revenue allocated to the material right is recognized when the additional goods are transferred to the customer or when the option expires. During 2018, the consideration allocated to material rights was not significant. 35 We receive payments from our customers based on billing schedules established in each contract. Up front payments and fees are recorded as deferred revenue upon receipt or when due, and may require deferral of revenue recognition to a future period until we perform our obligations under these arrangements. Amounts are recorded as accounts receivable when our right to consideration is unconditional. Generally, distributor contracts contain Free on Board (FOB) or Ex Works (EXW) shipping point terms where the customer pays the shipping company directly for all shipping and handling costs. In those contracts in which we pay for the shipping and handling, the associated costs are generally recorded along with the product sale at the time of shipment in cost of product revenue when control over the products has transferred to the customer. We do not collect sales tax on product sales as it is not applicable. Value add and other taxes collected by us concurrently with revenue producing activities are excluded from revenue. Our general product warranty does not extend beyond an assurance that the product or services delivered will be consistent with stated contractual specifications, which does not create a separate performance obligation. We recognize the incremental costs of obtaining contracts as an expense when incurred as the amortization period of the assets that we otherwise would have recognized is 1 year or less in accordance with the practical expedient in paragraph ASC 340 40 25 4. These costs are included in selling, general & administrative expenses. Included as a comp1nt of product revenue is sales based royalty revenue, which represents the utilization of our intellectual property licensed by our commercial partners. We record royalty revenues based on estimated net sales of licensed products as reported to us by our commercial partners. Differences between actual and estimated royalty revenues have not been material and are typically adjusted in the following quarter when the actual amounts are known. Licensing, Milest1 and Contract Revenue The agreements with Mitek include variable consideration such as contingent development and regulatory milest1s. As of the date of adoption of ASC 606, there is 1 remaining regulatory milest1 related to the Mitek agreements and we have no performance obligation related to this milest1 In general, variable consideration is included in the transaction price only to the extent a significant reversal in the amount of cumulative revenue recognized is not probable to occur. Future payments for regulatory milest1s will be recognized as revenue when the regulatory milest1 is considered probable of being achieved. Inventories Inventories are stated at the lower of standard cost and net realizable value, with approximate cost determined using the first in, first out method. Work in process and finished goods inventories include materials, labor, and manufacturing overhead. Inventory costs associated with product candidates that have not yet received regulatory approval are capitalized if we believe there is probable future commercial use and future economic benefit. Our policy is to write down inventory when conditions exist that suggest inventory may be in excess of anticipated demand or is obsolete based upon assumptions about future demand for our products and market conditions. We regularly evaluate our ability to realize the value of inventory based on a combination of factors including, but not limited to, historical usage rates, forecasted sales or usage, product end of life dates, and estimated current or future market values. Purchasing requirements and alternative usage avenues are explored within these processes to mitigate inventory exposure. 36 Goodwill and Acquired In Process Research and Development Goodwill is the amount by which the purchase price of acquired net assets in a business combination exceeded the fair values of net identifiable assets on the date of acquisition. Acquired In Process Research and Development ( IPR&D ) represents the fair value assigned to research and development assets that we acquire that have not been completed at the date of acquisition or are pending regulatory approval in certain jurisdictions. The value assigned to the acquired IPR&D is determined by estimating the costs to develop the acquired technology into commercially viable products, estimating the resulting revenue from the projects, and discounting the net cash flows to present value. Goodwill and IPR&D are evaluated for impairment annually, or more frequently if events or changes in circumstances indicate that the asset might be impaired. Factors we consider important, on an overall company basis, that could trigger an impairment review include significant underperformance relative to historical or projected future operating results, significant changes in our use of the acquired assets or the strategy for our overall business, significant negative industry or economic trends, a significant decline in our stock price for a sustained period, or a reduction of our market capitalization relative to net book value. To conduct impairment tests of goodwill, the fair value of the reporting unit is compared to its carrying value. If the reporting unit carrying value exceeds its fair value, we record an impairment loss to the extent that the carrying value of goodwill exceeds its implied fair value. Our annual assessment for impairment of goodwill as of November 30, 2018 indicated that the fair value of our reporting unit exceeded the carrying value of the reporting unit. To conduct impairment tests of IPR&D, the fair value of the IPR&D project is compared to its carrying value. If the carrying value exceeds its fair value, we record an impairment loss to the extent that the carrying value of the IPR&D project exceeds its fair value. We estimate the fair value for IPR&D projects using discounted cash flow valuation models, which require the use of significant estimates and assumptions, including, but not limited to, estimating the timing of and expected costs to complete the in process projects, projecting regulatory approvals, estimating future cash flows from product sales resulting from completed projects and in process projects, and developing appropriate discount rates. Our annual assessment for impairment of IPR&D indicated that the fair value of our other IPR&D assets as of November 30, 2018 exceeded their respective carrying values. See also the section capti1d Risk Factors Risks Related to Risks Related to Our Product Development and Regulatory Compliance Failure to obtain, or any delay in obtaining, FDA or other U.S. and foreign governmental approvals for our products may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations for a discussion regarding the effect that failure to obtain, or any delay in obtaining, FDA or other U.S. and foreign governmental approvals could have on our business and financial performance. Through December 31, 2018, there have not been any events or changes in circumstances that indicate that the carrying value of goodwill or acquired intangible assets may not be recoverable. We continue to monitor and evaluate the financial performance of our business, including the impact of general economic conditions, to assess the potential for the fair value of the reporting unit to decline below its book value. There can be no assurance that, at the time future impairment tests are completed, a material impairment charge will not be recorded. Long Lived Assets Long lived assets primarily include property and equipment and intangible assets with finite lives. Our intangible assets are comprised of purchased developed technologies, distributor relationships, patents, and a fully amortized trade name. The distributor relationships and trade name were fully amortized as of December 31, 2018. These intangible assets are carried at cost, net of accumulated amortization. Amortization is recorded on a straight line basis over the intangible assets' useful lives, which range from 5 to 16 years. We review long lived assets for impairment when events or changes in business circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of the assets may not be fully recoverable or that the useful lives of those assets are no longer appropriate. Each impairment test is based on a comparison of the undiscounted cash flows to the recorded value of the asset. If impairment is indicated, the asset is written down to its estimated fair value based on a discounted cash flow analysis. 37 Stock Based Compensation We measure the compensation cost of award recipients services received in exchange for an award of equity instruments based on the grant date fair value of the underlying award. That cost is recognized over the period during which an employee is required to provide service in exchange for the award. For performance based awards with financial achievement targets, we recognize expense using the graded vesting methodology based on the number of shares expected to vest. Compensation cost associated with performance grants is estimated using the Black Scholes valuation method multiplied by the expected number of shares to be issued, which is adjusted based on the estimated probabilities of achieving the performance goals. Changes to the probability assessment and the estimated shares expected to vest will result in adjustments to the related share based compensation expense that will be recorded in the period of the change. If the performance targets are not achieved, no compensation cost is recognized and any previously recognized compensation cost is reversed. See Note 13, Equity Incentive Plan , to the consolidated financial statements included elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K for a description of the types of stock based awards granted, the compensation expense related to such awards, and detail of equity based awards outstanding. See Note 16, Income Taxes , to the consolidated financial statements included elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K for details related to the tax benefit recognized in the consolidated statement of operations for stock based compensation. Income Taxes Our income tax expense includes U.S. and international income taxes. Certain Item of income and expense are not reported in tax returns and financial statements in the same year. The tax effects of these differences are reported as deferred tax assets and liabilities. Deferred tax assets are recognized for the estimated future tax effects of deductible temporary differences and tax operating loss and credit carry forwards. Changes in deferred tax assets and liabilities are recorded in the provision for income taxes. We assess the likelihood that our deferred tax assets will be recovered from future taxable income, and to the extent we believe that it is more likely than not that all or a portion of deferred tax assets will not be realized, we establish a valuation allowance. To the extent we establish a valuation allowance or increase this allowance in a period, we include an expense within the tax provision in the consolidated statement of operations. 38 Results of Operations Year ended December 31, 2018 compared to year ended December 31, 2017 Statement of Operations Detail Years Ended December 31, 2018 2017 $ Inc (Dec) % Inc (Dec) (in thousands, except percentages) Product revenue $ 105,531 $ 107,783 $ (2,252 ) (2 %) Licensing, milest1 and contract revenue 24 5,637 (5,613 ) (100 %) Total revenue 105,555 113,420 (7,865 ) (7 %) Operating expenses Cost of product revenue 31,280 27,364 3,916 14 % Research & development 18,190 18,787 (597 ) (3 %) Selling, general & administrative 34,336 21,540 12,796 59 % Total operating expenses 83,806 67,691 16,115 24 % Income from operations 21,749 45,729 (23,980 ) (52 %) Interest income, net 1,458 473 985 208 % Income before income taxes 23,207 46,202 (22,995 ) (50 %) Provision for income taxes 4,485 14,386 (9,901 ) (69 %) Net income $ 18,722 $ 31,816 $ (13,094 ) (41 %) Product gross profit $ 74,251 $ 80,419 $ (6,168 ) (8 %) Product gross margin 70 % 75 % Total revenue Total revenue for the year ended December 31, 2018 decreased by $7.9 million, as compared to the prior year, to $105.6 million. This decrease was primarily due to the achievement of a 1 time $5.0 million milest1 in 2017 for reaching a target MONOVISC U.S. end user sales threshold set forth in the Mitek MONOVISC Agreement and the absence of an equivalent milest1 payment in 2018, as well as the impact of pricing declines in the U.S. viscosupplement market and the previously described voluntary recall of certain production lots of certain of our HYAFF based products. Product revenue Product revenue for the year ended December 31, 2018 was $105.6 million, a decrease of $23 million, or 20%, compared to prior year. A moderate decrease in our dermal and orthobiologics product revenue was partially offset by a product revenue increase in our surgical and other franchises. The following table presents comparative product revenue analysis by product franchise Years Ended December 31, 2018 2017 $ Inc (Dec) % Inc (Dec) Orthobiologics $ 93,556 $ 93,816 $ (260 ) (0 %) Dermal 396 2,755 (2,359 ) (86 %) Surgical 5,514 5,262 252 5 % Other 6,065 5,950 115 2 % $ 105,531 $ 107,783 $ (2,252 ) (2 %) Orthobiologics Our orthobiologics franchise consists of our joint health and orthopedic products. Overall, revenue from our orthobiologics franchises decreased by $0.3 million in 2018 as compared to 2017 primarily as a result of the voluntary recall of certain production lots of our HYAFF based products and a decline in worldwide ORTHOVISC revenue offset in part by strong growth in domestic MONOVISC and international CINGAL revenue. In addition, sales volume gains for our U.S. viscosupplements were offset by pricing declines in the U.S. viscosupplement market, a trend we expect to continue in 2019. Overall, we expect orthobiologics product revenue in 2019 to decrease as compared to 2018, primarily due to the ORTHOVISC and MONOVISC pricing declines in the U.S. viscosupplement market, offset in part by growth in global CINGAL revenue and the commercial launch of our injectable, HA based surgical b1 repair product via the previously described hybrid commercial approach. 39 Dermal Our dermal franchise consists of advanced wound care products, which are based on our HYAFF technology, and aesthetic dermal fillers. Our advanced wound care products treat complex skin wounds ranging from burns to diabetic ulcers, with HYALOMATRIX and HYALOFILL as the lead products. Dermal revenue had a significant decline in 2018 as compared to 2017 due to the previously described voluntary recall of certain production lots of our HYAFF based products. We resolved the matter and resumed shipment of these products in November 2018, and we expect dermal revenue to increase in 2019 to pre recall levels as compared to 2018. Surgical Our surgical franchise consists primarily of our anti adhesion products, HYALOBARRIER and our ENT offerings, of which MEROGEL is the leading product. We are partnered with Medtronic for the worldwide distribution of our ENT products. Revenue from our surgical products increased $0.3 million, or 5%, in 2018 as compared to 2017. The increase of surgical product revenue was primarily due to an increase in sales of our ENT products. We expect surgical product revenue to increase in 2019 as compared to 2018 primarily due to increased worldwide revenue of surgical anti adhesion product and ENT sales in the U.S. Other Other product revenue was derived from sales of our ophthalmic and veterinary products. Other product revenue increased modestly in 2018 as compared to 2017 primarily as a result of increased sales of ophthalmic products. We expect other revenue to increase in 2019 as compared to 2018, driven by increases in demand for our ophthalmic and veterinary products. Licensing, milest1 and contract revenue Licensing, milest1 and contract revenue for the year ended December 31, 2018 was insignificant, compared to $5.6 million for 2017. This decrease was primarily due to the achievement of a 1 time $5.0 million milest1 in 2017 for reaching a target MONOVISC U.S. end user sales threshold set forth in the Mitek MONOVISC Agreement and the absence of an equivalent milest1 payment in 2018. We expect licensing, milest1 and contract revenue to be at an equivalent level in 2019 as compared to 2018. Product gross profit and margin Product gross profit for the year ended December 31, 2018 was $74.3 million, or 70% of product revenue, as compared with $80.4 million, or 75% of product revenue, for the year ended December 31, 2017. The decrease in product gross margin for the twelve month period ended December 31, 2018 was primarily caused by an increase in inventory reserves related to certain raw materials, inventory write offs and charges associated with the previously described voluntary recall of certain production lots of our HYAFF based products, higher production costs, and revenue mix and pricing dynamics. Research and development Research and development expenses for the year ended December 31, 2018 decreased by $0.6 million, or 3%, as compared to the prior year, mainly due to a decrease in expenses for our HYALOFAST and CINGAL phase III clinical trials, partially offset by increases in our product development activities, including those related to the development of a product for rotator cuff therapy and pre commercial development of our injectable, HA based surgical b1 repair product. Research and development expense as a percentage of total revenue was 17% in 2018 and 2017. Research and development expenses are expected to increase in 2019 and beyond compared to 2018 as we further develop new products and initiate clinical trials based on our development activities, perform required post market clinical follow ups for our MONOVISC and ORTHOVISC T products in the European Union, and as a result of current or future changes to the regulatory environments in the jurisdictions in which we do business. 40 Selling, general and administrative Selling, general and administrative expenses for the year ended December 31, 2018 increased by $128 million, or 59%, as compared to 2017. The increase was primarily due to non cash stock based compensation expense related to the retirement of our former Chief Executive Officer, non recurring CINGAL U.S. pre launch market research activities, and increased personnel and external professional fees. We expect selling, general and administrative expenses for 2019 to approximate those for 2018 and include investments in our commercial capabilities and the implementation of improved operational and financial technology platforms required to grow our business both domestically and internationally. Income taxes Provisions for income taxes were $4.5 million and $14.4 million for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively. The decrease in the effective tax rate in 2018 of 118%, as compared to 2017, is primarily due to the reduction of Federal Corporate Income Tax rate as a result of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 ( Tax Act ) tax reform legislation. This legislation makes significant changes to the U.S. tax law, including a reduction in the corporate tax rate from 35% to 21% starting in 2018. In addition, the Company realized a windfall tax benefit in 2018 related to exercises of employee equity awards resulting in a discrete period income tax benefit of $15 million compared to $0.4 million in 2017. A reconciliation of the U.S. federal statutory tax rate to the effective tax rate for the periods ending December 31 is as follows Years ended December 31, 2018 2017 Statutory federal income tax rate 210% 35.0% State tax expense, net of federal benefit 5.5% 4.8% Impact of rate change on deferred taxes 0.0% (4.9)% State investment tax credit (0.2)% (0.7)% Federal, state and foreign research and development credits (34)% (14)% Foreign rate differential (0.4)% 0.5% Domestic production deduction 0.0% (28)% Stock compensation (4.8)% (0.2)% Non deductible Section 162(m) compensation limitation 4.3% 0.7% Foreign derived intangible income deduction (13)% 0.0% Other, including nondeductible expenses (14)% 0.1% Effective income tax rate 19.3% 311% As of December 31, 2018, we had gross net operating losses ( NOL ) for income tax purposes in Italy of $5.8 million with no expiration date. In connection with the preparation of the financial statements, we performed an analysis to ascertain if it was more likely than not that we would be able to utilize, in future periods, the net deferred tax assets associated with our NOL carry forward. We have concluded that the positive evidence outweighs the negative evidence and, thus, that the deferred tax assets are realizable on a more likely than not basis. As such, we have not recorded a valuation allowance at December 31, 2018 or 2017. In the normal course of business, Anika and its subsidiaries may be periodically examined by various taxing authorities. We file income tax returns in the U.S. federal jurisdiction, in certain U.S. states, and in Italy. The associated tax filings remain subject to examination by applicable tax authorities for a certain length of time following the tax year to which those filings relate. The 2015 through 2017 tax years remain subject to examination by the IRS and other taxing authorities for U.S. federal and state tax purposes. The 2012 through 2017 tax years remain subject to examination by the appropriate governmental authorities for Italy. Net income For the year ended December 31, 2018, net income was $18.7 million, or $127 per diluted share, compared to $318 million, or $211 per diluted share, for the same period in the prior year. The decrease in net income and diluted earnings per share was primarily a result of decreased total revenue, decreased product gross margin, the impact of the previously described voluntary recall of certain production lots of certain of our HYAFF based products, and 1 time expenses associated with the retirement of our former CEO and CINGAL U.S. pre launch market research activities. The decreased revenue and increased expenses are offset by a decreased effective federal income tax rate as a result of the 2017 Income Tax Reform Legislation. 41 Year ended December 31, 2017 compared to year ended December 31, 2016 Statement of Operations Detail Years Ended December 31, 2017 2016 $ Inc (Dec) %Inc (Dec) (in thousands, except percentages) Product revenue $ 107,783 $ 102,932 $ 4,851 5 % Licensing, milest1 and contract revenue 5,637 447 5,190 1,161 % Total revenue 113,420 103,379 10,041 10 % Operating expenses Cost of product revenue 27,364 24,027 3,337 14 % Research & development 18,787 10,732 8,055 75 % Selling, general & administrative 21,540 18,013 3,527 20 % Total operating expenses 67,691 52,772 14,919 28 % Income from operations 45,729 50,607 (4,878 ) (10 %) Interest income, net 473 263 210 80 % Income before income taxes 46,202 50,870 (4,668 ) (9 %) Provision for income taxes 14,386 18,323 (3,937 ) (21 %) Net income $ 31,816 $ 32,547 $ (731 ) (2 %) Product gross profit $ 80,419 $ 78,905 $ 1,514 2 % Product gross margin 75 % 77 % Total revenue Total revenue for the year ended December 31, 2017 increased by $10.0 million, as compared to the prior year, to $1134 million. This increase was primarily due to the growth of our orthobiologics franchise, specifically an increase in global MONOVISC revenue and our achievement of $5.0 million of milest1 revenue in 2017 for reaching a target MONOVISC U.S. end user sales threshold set forth in the Mitek MONOVISC Agreement. Product revenue Product revenue for the year ended December 31, 2017 was $107.8 million, an increase of $4.9 million, or 5.0%, compared to the prior year. Product revenue increases in our Orthobiologics, Dermal, and Other franchises were partially offset by moderate decreases in product revenue in our Surgical franchise. The following table presents comparative product revenue analysis by product franchise Years Ended December 31, 2017 2016 $ Inc (Dec) % Inc (Dec) (in thousands, except percentages) Orthobiologics $ 93,816 $ 89,695 $ 4,121 5 % Dermal 2,755 2,759 (4 ) (0 %) Surgical 5,262 5,427 (165 ) (3 %) Other 5,950 5,051 899 18 % $ 107,783 $ 102,932 $ 4,851 5 % Orthobiologics Our orthobiologics franchise consists of our joint health and orthopedic products. Overall, revenue from our orthobiologics franchises increased $4.1 million, or 5%, in 2017 as compared to 2016. The growth in 2017 reflected a growing end user demand, continued market penetration, increased revenue from worldwide MONOVISC sales, and CINGAL revenue associated with the product commercial launch in Canada and Europe in 2016. ORTHOVISC and MONOVISC global revenue also increased 1% in 2017 as compared to 2016. The increase in international viscosupplement revenue in 2017 was driven primarily by increased sales of MONOVISC resulting from a robust and growing end user demand. 42 Dermal Our dermal franchise consists of advanced wound care products, which are based on our HYAFF technology, and aesthetic dermal fillers. Our advanced wound care products treat complex skin wounds ranging from burns to diabetic ulcers, with HYALOMATRIX and HYALOFILL as the lead products. Dermal revenue had no significant change in 2017 as compared to 2016. The revenue, in part, is from the agreement we entered into in July 2014 with Medline Industries, Inc. to commercialize HYALOMATRIX in the United States on an exclusive basis through 2022 Surgical Our surgical franchise consists of products used to prevent surgical adhesions and to treat ear, nose, and throat ( ENT ) disorders. Sales of our surgical products decreased $0.2 million, or 3%, in 2017 as compared to 2016. The decrease of surgical product revenue was primarily due to a decrease in sales generated by our ENT products and unfavorable impact from foreign currency exchange rate fluctuations compared with the same periods in the prior year. Our surgical franchise consists primarily of our anti adhesion products, including HYALOBARRIER and our ENT offerings, of which MEROGEL is the leading product. We are partnered with Medtronic for the worldwide distribution of our ENT products. Other Other product revenue includes revenues from ophthalmic and veterinary products. The other product revenue increased in 2017 from 2016 due to a recovery from weak 2016 sales volume for these franchises. Licensing, milest1 and contract revenue Licensing, milest1 and contract revenue for the year ended December 31, 2017 was $5.6 million, compared to $0.4 million for 2016. The year over year increase was primarily the result of the recognition of licensing and milest1 revenue for the year ended December 31, 2017 of $5.0 million for the achievement of a milest1 payment under the Mitek MONOVISC Agreement. During the second quarter of 2017, we collected and fully recognized revenue for a milest1 payment of $5.0 million as a result of U.S. MONOVISC 12 month end user sales exceeding $100 million. Product gross profit and margin Product gross profit for the year ended December 31, 2017 was $80.4 million, or 75% of product revenue, as compared with $78.9 million, or 77% of product revenue, for the year ended December 31, 2016. The increase in product gross profit was primarily due to the increased volume compared to the prior year, while the decrease in product gross margin was due to inventory write offs in 2017, as well as certain lower than anticipated product yields during the insource of the manufacturing of certain products to our Bedford facility . Research and development Research and development expenses for the year ended December 31, 2017 increased by $8.1 million, or 75%, as compared to the prior year, mainly due to an increase in expenses for our HYALOFAST and CINGAL phase III clinical trials. We also increased our pre clinical product development activities, including with respect to achieving a 510(k) clearance of an injectable, HA based surgical b1 repair product. Research and development expense as a percentage of total revenue was 17% in 2017 and 10% in 2016. Selling, general and administrative Selling, general and administrative expenses for the year ended December 31, 2017 increased by $35 million, or 20%, as compared to 2016. The increase was primarily as a result of increased personnel related costs, external professional fees, and additions to our allowance for doubtful accounts. 43 Income taxes Provisions for income taxes were $14.4 million and $18.3 million for the years ended December 31, 2017 and 2016, respectively. The decrease in the effective tax rate in 2017 of 4.9%, as compared to 2016, is primarily due to the revaluation of the deferred tax liability as a result of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act tax reform legislation and an increased benefit from research and development activities. In accordance with Staff Accounting Bulletin No. 118, which provides guidance on accounting for the tax effects of the 2017 Tax Act, we have recorded a reasonable estimate of the impact on the consolidated financial statements. The provisional amounts incorporate assumptions made based upon our current interpretation and implementation guidance of the 2017 Tax Act. A reconciliation of the U.S. federal statutory tax rate to the effective tax rate for the periods ending December 31 is as follows Years ended December 31, 2017 2016 Statutory federal income tax rate 35.0 % 35.0 % State tax expense, net of federal benefit 4.8 % 4.5 % Impact of rate change on deferred taxes (4.9 %) 0.0 % Permanent Item, including nondeductible expenses 0.6 % 0.5 % State investment tax credit (0.7 %) (0.1 %) Federal, state and foreign research and development credits (14 %) (0.9 %) Foreign rate differential 0.5 % (0.1 %) Domestic production deduction (28 %) (29 %) Effective income tax rate 311 % 36.0 % As of December 31, 2017, we had gross NOL for income tax purposes in Italy of $4.0 million with no expiration date. In connection with the preparation of the financial statements, we performed an analysis to ascertain if it was more likely than not that we would be able to utilize, in future periods, the net deferred tax assets associated with our NOL carry forward. We have concluded that the positive evidence outweighs the negative evidence and, thus, that the deferred tax assets not otherwise subject to a valuation allowance are realizable on a more likely than not basis. As such, we have not recorded a valuation allowance at December 31, 2017 or 2016. In the normal course of business, Anika and its subsidiaries may be periodically examined by various taxing authorities. We file income tax returns in the U.S. federal jurisdiction, in certain U.S. states, and in Italy. The associated tax filings remain subject to examination by applicable tax authorities for a certain length of time following the tax year to which those filings relate. Net income For the year ended December 31, 2017, net income was $318 million, or $211 per diluted share, compared to $325, or $215 per diluted share, for the same period in the prior year. The decrease in net income and diluted earnings per share was primarily a result of increased expenses for our HYALOFAST and CINGAL phase III clinical trials and increases in personnel related costs, external professional fees, and additions to our allowance for doubtful accounts. These increased expenses are offset by increased total revenue and a decreased effective federal income tax rate as a result of the 2017 Income Tax Reform Legislation. Concentration of Risk We have historically derived the majority of our revenues from a small number of customers, most of whom resell our products to end users and most of whom are significantly larger companies than us. For the year ended December 31, 2018, five customers accounted for 86% of product revenue, with Mitek al1 accounting for 73% of product revenue. We expect to continue to be dependent on a small number of large customers, especially Mitek, for the majority of our revenues for the foreseeable future. The failure of these customers to purchase our products in the amounts they historically have or in amounts that we expect would seriously harm our business. 44 In addition, if present and future customers terminate their purchasing arrangements with us, significantly reduce or delay their orders, or seek to renegotiate their agreements on terms less favorable to us, our business, financial condition, and results of operations will be adversely affected. If we accept terms less favorable than the terms of the current agreements, such renegotiations may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and or results of operations. Furthermore, in any future negotiations we may be subject to the perceived or actual leverage that these customers may have given their relative size and importance to us. Any termination, change, reduction, or delay in orders could seriously harm our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Accordingly, unless and until we diversify and expand our customer base, our future success will significantly depend upon the timing and size of future purchases by our largest customers and the financial and operational success of these customers. The loss of any 1 of our major customers or the delay of significant orders from such customers, even if only temporary, could reduce or delay our recognition of revenues, harm our reputation in the industry, and reduce our ability to accurately predict cash flow, and, as a consequence, it could seriously harm our business, financial condition, and results of operations. See Note 3, Revenue by Product Group, by Significant Customer and by Geographic Location; Geographic Information , to the consolidated financial statements included elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K for information regarding significant customers. Liquidity and Capital Resources We require cash to fund our operating expenses and to make capital expenditures. Historically we have generated positive cash flow from operations, which, together with our available cash, investments, and debt, have met our cash requirements. Cash, cash equivalents, and investments totaled $159.0 million and $157.3 million, and working capital totaled $1917 million and $1933 million, at December 31, 2018 and December 31, 2017, respectively. As of December 31, 2018, we have $50.0 million of available credit under our senior revolving credit facility with Bank of America, N.A., and we were in compliance with the terms of said credit agreement. We believe that we have adequate financial resources to support our business for at least the next twelve months. Cash provided by operating activities was $34.9 million, $40.8 million, and $24.4 million for 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively. The decrease in cash provided by operations in 2018 was due primarily to higher operating expenses in manufacturing operations, sales and marketing, and an increase in inventory on hand offset by a decrease in accounts receivable. Cash used in investing activities was $50.3 million, $125 million, and $6.8 million for 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively. The increase was due to increased purchases of investments, partially offset by lower capital expenditures as compared to 2017 and 2016. Cash provided (used) by financing activities was ($28.9) million, $0.3 million, and ($24.0) million for 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively. The increase in cash used in financing activities for the year ended December 31, 2018 was primarily attributable to the utilization of $30.0 million cash to repurchase outstanding common stock under the Fixed Dollar Accelerated Share Repurchase program and $18 million of tax payments related to employee tax withholdings on vested RSAs which were retired, offset in part by $29 million in proceeds from equity awards. Similarly, the Company initiated a $25.0 million accelerated share repurchase program in February 2016 and concluded the program in August 2016. 45 Contractual Obligations and Other Commercial Commitments The table below summarizes our non cancelable operating leases, purchase commitments, and contractual obligations related to future periods which are not reflected in our consolidated balance sheet at December 31, 2018. Purchase commitments relate primarily to non cancellable inventory commitments and capital expenditures entered in the normal course of business Payments due by period (in thousands) Less than More than Total 1 year 1 3 years 3 5 years 5 years Operating Leases (1) $ 8,703 $ 1,879 $ 3,841 $ 2,086 $ 897 Purchase Commitments (2) 17,591 13,132 2,087 1,589 783 Year Ended December 31, 2018 $ 26,294 $ 15,011 $ 5,928 $ 3,675 $ 1,680 (1) Includes a lease we entered into in January 2007, pursuant to which we lease our corporate headquarters facility, which consists of approximately 134,000 square feet of general office, research and development, and manufacturing space located in Bedford, Massachusetts. The lease has an initial term of ten and 1 half years, and commenced in May 2007. In February 2017, we finalized the exercise of its first option under the lease to extend the terms from November 1, 2017 through October 31, 2022, including the determination of a new annual base rent of $15 million which is included in the disclosure above. No other terms of this lease were altered. We have an option under this lease to extend its lease term for up to 3 additional periods subject to the condition that the Company notify the landlord that we are exercising each option at least 1 year prior to the expiration of the original or then current term. The next 2 renewal options each extend the term an additional five years, while the final renewal option extends the term by six years. This schedule does not include the amounts that would be due if the company exercised the renewal options. Also includes a lease entered into pursuant to which Anika S.r.l. leases its Italian facility. In October 2015, Anika S.r.l, entered into a build to suit lease agreement for a new European headquarters facility consisting of approximately 33,000 square feet of general office, research and development, training, and warehousing space located in Padova, Italy. This lease has an initial term of fifteen years which commenced in February 2017. The lease will automatically renew for up to 3 additional six year terms, subject to certain terms and conditions. We have the ability to withdraw from this lease subject to certain financial penalties after six years and with no penalties after the ninth year. As such, lease commitments through the ninth year are included in the table above. The lease provides for an initial yearly rent of approximately $0.3 million. See the section capti1d Item 2 Properties
